Check it out in [action.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7ju9MGtbRu4&amp;)
Screamer at the end. You motherfucker :P
I bought *Tea for the Tillerman* a couple weeks ago for $1.50. I don't dig it much.
yeah totally go ahead and buy birth control from a shady internet site without a prescription.  see you in a few months crying about having to get an abortion...  seriously, get a fucking pap.  if you're sexually active, you probably have hpv.  if you have hpv, you need to make sure that you don't have one of the strains that lead to cervical cancer.  i mean 15 minutes of your time can save you dying slowly and painfully from cancer.  worth it.
the rapture needs to hurry up and get here already.
oh ok.  So that's why many cat experts suggest that cats don't go outdoors?
Hell yeah! :D
check t-mo forums, there is something about the 'you will get it by' date moved to December.
server address is on the side :) &gt;&gt;&gt;
&gt;Small Packet of Brown Sugar (9g)  Wha? Why the sugar? You're going to have a sugar rush then a sugar crash. Why not just have some fruit. 
Like the US?
Then grab your gun and bring in the cat.
You do if your job is being Tracy Chapman.
 Perhaps a new party should be created. Call it the Sanity Party
Sounds like a witch.
I'm starting to think that getting married after 27 or so would be best. Usually adult onset mental problems such as bipolar disorders, schizophrenia manifest about or before this time.
We call that 5th base around here
Denise didn't tell me because when we were dating I had been being respectful in regards to not rushing intimate relations, I was respectful to her.  Then she went out and hooked up with her ex, parties, did him and hide it.  After we had begun having relations, HE bumped into us and dropped the bomb... and the lies came out...  A bunch of betrayal and lies. I walked away...  She chose not to tell me... said she had hurt me enough and wanted to  convince herself that the man she was with after me was BJ's dad.  Finally decided that wasn't fair and told us both.   go figure.
So did you have fun at the rally?
Agreed, however, don't go to China and insist everyone convery to Islam, that is fucking stupid, no?
What if she's the one... Why is he preparing to lose his best friend. If they are best friends and really best friends, in time it will come to pass and they will move on from it.
Sorry mate, traded one just now. I've updated the post with the hats I'm looking now.
Well, the thing about Fox News that everyone misses is that while FNC gets the best ratings of any 24-hour cable news channel, any given broadcast network news hour gets an order of magnitude more viewers than all of cable news put together. If more popularity really did mean better, the ABC, NBC, and CBS news shows would be the news news around. (And Jersey Shore would be one of the greatest achievements of mankind, far outstripping all news reporting.)
Funny, I met someone who was dressed as McGruber and I thought he was Marty McFly.
Yes, because only freshmen possibly hit one letter when they meant another. Although the irony is palpable.
I've found that increasing distance and accuracy with a forehand comes from a smooth, fluid throw, NOT a powerful throw. When I shank a shot, 9/10 times it's because I tried to throw the disc hard instead of trying to throw it smoothly. 
It was made while you were at the rally
haha! that's great!
so. what does google have to say? 
fffffffffuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuu!
I would imagine it's because the point of an assignment is generally to exercise the mind. Reusing old essays means you don't reevaluate information or explore possibilities you may not have considered before. The professor assumes you approach their assignment with a fresh perspective so that you can engage the material to the greatest extent possible. I would say cycling in old essays is dishonest because your work product appears to represent your attempt to meet those goals, when in actuality you didn't engage in any intellectual exercise for the assignment at hand.
I used the word correctly as an adjective. As a noun, it means a person who follows the religion. You used it as the name of the religion. This is incorrect.
You can do this with pretty much any English sentence. Just random words have no context though.
Wall Street is a pretty good movie dude.
British Conservatives Vs US Conservatives The UK conservative party (Tories) are equivalent to the US Democrats who support national health care, government programs, subsidized school lunch programs and support cheaper higher education. W...hat is equivalent to the US Republicans, Tea Bagger and GOP platform to the rest of the world? Fascists? Military Party? Corporate?  We are a young country and it just seems that we are not looking towards those free countries who have tried (and failed) at a conservative government.  I believe in a fiscal policy but the US is the richest country in the world. We should not be in debt, have poor, uneducated, homeless. We should have the best National Health care, not national insurance.  One of the promising GOP candidates will be bringing a bill (when he is elected) to have a $2000 deductible for anyone on Medicare or Medicaid.  It is time to stop being a country that is so politically sustained by capitalism and profit. I don't care if it is a republican or democrat in office.  How a country takes care of its poor, not the rich, is the reflection of its greatness. The US has failed its citizens by throwing out out the Republic for Capitalism (Kleptocracy).
They say that an announcement will be made on the 8th, personally I hope that the hardware will not be too far from what we have so we would be able to get more ports and ASOP stuff. 
The only guaranteed way to end exploitation is to end it within yourself.  You can only count on yourself, and hope that everyone else follows.
[Stewart's Rally for 'Sanity' Draws Insane Crowd](http://www.foxnews.com/us/2010/10/30/stewarts-rally-sanity-brings-urgency-chage/)
m&amp;ms
You're probably not going to get wasted off of two drinks either.  In both cases the effects being felt are a side effect of a poisoning of the body. And as my physiology professor was extremely fond of saying "The dose makes the poison."
Haha this is the one Redditor picture I saw being taken, was standing about 50 ft behind the photographer!
Done!
Haven't read The God Delusion, yet. But the bible is exactly why I am an atheist.
I gave blood for the first time a few weeks ago and proceeded to pass out on this guys desk when I went back to class. I'd do it again :)
Good to know, thanks :)
"Nuclear Launch Detected"
[This](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HWc3WY3fuZU)
Call em fags when they comply with the search method. Enough people call em fags for doing that and they wont comply anymore. Who wants a job that requires you be called a fag all day, for grabbing guys balls.
That's what the middle of the country is for.... 
All he needs is a pair of real Blublockers.
WHAT...   My only question is...   Is there porn of it before there is something of it??? 
Hmmm.....seems like his plan worked.
anything can be addictive. it's simply a question of quantity and frequency.
I kind of agree with this, but you have to scale down the weapons too.  The legendary Minotaur would be no match for a shotgun or a rocket launcher.  However, Minotaur versus crowbar or small shitty dagger might be pretty damn scary.  It just has to beat you in most physical ways, the only way to kill it would be to outmaneuver and outsmart it.
MechAngel's right.  This kind of behaviour is real abuse.  My mother was also extremely controlling, and if you don't put a stop to it now it will just get worse.  I am not exaggerating when I say that if you cave in to her now, she'll be controlling every single thing you do. You are lucky, having two brothers though - I had to break free on my own (will provide more details privately if you wish).  If you guys stick together, there's nothing you won't be able to accomplish.  You were right about not going on TV incidentally.  Advertising your faith in such a crass manner is not Christian at all.
I heard that in jar jar's voice. Damn you.
Yeah, someone posted this: http://i.imgur.com/fqMCc.jpg
*curls up into a little ball* The creepers... so many green crunchy explosions... so... little... arrows...
Well hopefully if it passes, I'm guessing the next states to follow will be the bordering liberal states, then Canada. A few years later, Mexico if they get a good president. Then slowly the red states will follow.  That's my guess. 
It definitely won't be in the near-future (no camcorder, no money, no free time). But I'd really like to do this at one point. All this beefy talk of my skills is just that without proof.
Unfortunately, no, that's not me.  That video did blow my fucking mind though, because not only have I been using the name 'Unidan' on line since the early 90's, my real first name is actually 'Ben' and I thought someone on this video had assumed my life.
find out what she wishes you'd do in bed. we want sex just as much as you, but its harder for us to have "good" sex. 
Yes, we want you to STARVE!
They don't like Sesame Street? 
Corporations do not share his views.
Did you know:  The Amish were founded by John Amish in 1242. Prof. Amish aimed for a society in which modern thought was ignored, in favor of more "pure" pursuits. Back then his group vowed to ignore many things, including Chinese civilization, science, technology, philosophy and literature.  The Amish have slowly progressed, slightly behind the rest of the world and it is estimated that in 2112 Prof. Amish's group will embrace the internet, closely followed by the iPod, iPhone and other mobile devices around 2120.  It is, of course, impossible to predict what the internet will be like at that point in time, but it is assumed most civilized societies will have moved on to something more technologically advanced and the Amish will find themselves in cyberspace, with no one to share it with.
Pft of course! Done!  &lt;3 Spv
Absolutely out of the question, madame. How dare you expect such a thing!
Not seeing how they ripped you off.  Different drugs for different uses.  Do your research before you buy.  Anyway, yes Pseudoephedrine is far better.  
In my experiences you'll be let off more lenienently if you pull over (in a safe spot) the second you see the red and blues. It's pretty stupid to speed on highways to begin with since there's ALWAYS speed traps (in NY it's worse than ever before since the state is broke).  I've learned to save opening the throttle up for twisty farm country back roads and over mountains and stuff. I'd rather leave earlier and have a relaxing ride through traffic than speed (even though it's fun) and risk more points on the license.  Just because you ride a fast bike doesn't mean you need to ride it fast everywhere you go.  Edit: Cruiser riders riding ability has never impressed me thus far. They don't speed, and it seems like they're only out on a bike for the sake of actually being on one and looking cool, rather than finding the good roads and riding bikes like they're meant to be ridden (more fast than not and with a good degree of lean). A lot of cruisers I've seen struggle to stay balanced at slow speeds like coming up to a red light or slowly leaving one and can barely stay in a straight line. 
I HAVE A GIRLFRIEND!!!!
On a related note, who gives a shit if a 9 year old yells Epic Fail. That's funny. 
Makes sense to me.  I don't get why a woman would want to specialize in mens anatomy either, it just seems stupid.
What is sad is there are people like you who actually believe that. I would also like reiterate persnicketyshamwow's comment by also telling you to fuck off troll. The straight people are fucking little kids way more than the gays are.
I'm not an adult but i'll sit down and have a cup of coffee any time! that is if you're anywhere near lansing michigan, I don't feel like travelling. 
Why the shit did you link to the lightbox?
Prepare yourself for Minecraft jokes.  Ontopic: [ehow](http://www.ehow.com/videos-on_3089_learn-art-mime.html) seems to have some very good tutorial videos on the subject. 
How coincidental.
Similar to the fellow at the Toronto tree March.  Except he fell and died, total buzkill
*Ghetto Trooperstar, that is what you are...*  Fuck...now that song is stuck in my head.
If you mean will they send you a bottle containing the drug of your choice, then yes, some are.  However, you're as likely to get pills which contain nothing, contain something other than what you ordered, are expired and not effective, etc as you are to get what you paid for.  There was some research done awhile back (couple years maybe?  Google should know) where they ordered things from many places and tested them, and it was about 50/50 which ones actually sold quality prescription drugs.  Birth control pills would not likely be too difficult to find.  Controlled substances, things which are Scheduled, are going to be much, much harder to find than simple prescription drugs simply because they are watched for, and those places busted with far more frequency.  With normal prescription drugs, you would probably never face any legal consequences... but with controlled substances, if Customs picks your package to search, you could be in quite deep trouble.  (If Customs found normal prescription drugs, they would just keep it and send you a big document saying "we're keeping your stuff.  If you want to challenge this in court, we will destroy you.  Shut up about it, and nothing happens."
im just warming up, dont worry about it
HEY REDDIT, LOOK AT ME I HAVE A ROOT  edit: Or easy screenshots I guess. Good point. 
hey! .. you were the one getting your skirts all tangled because of a fascination for that particular ism .. and now you want me to explain what it means to you?
Do you know about ev/dev? It is a fascinating aspect of evolutionary biology. Development put interesting constraints on morphology and evolution.
Lady GaGa is one of the few pop stars that goes against the grain. She's actually quite a talented songwriter, especially considering some of her pre-gaga stuff. She can also perform quite well live.  Everything she does is so extreme and over the top, she's pretty much an intentional satire of herself. But don't let it fool you, it's entirely an act.  Now that she's established herself as an artist, the labels will likely give her a pretty long leash. I suspect she'll get less poppy over time and produce some fantastic music. 
I've been using a XCEL 6/5/4 for the  past 5 winters(NH, USA), it's held up great and I plan on buying another XCEL next time around. 
Nashville &gt; Chattanooga. Nashville just has so much more to offer. I think we can all agree, though, that Knoxville is a dump outside of the university.
15k people in the stream... I don't think she can hold much longer captain!
Those are some of the most common things I hear people say when they are trying to convince me that I need to have kids. Also, to pass on their lineage, or to create a combined version of theirselves with their partners. 
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KEIYNvwXD0Q how well does this one work?
I've studied this a lot and would be happy to talk to you about it if you like.  A few months ago a redditor I met on a thread addressing these sorts of issues pointed me at the book [Good Calories, Bad Calories](http://www.amazon.com/Good-Calories-Bad-Gary-Taubes/dp/1400040787) by Gary Taubes.  Based on what I read there and the followup reading I have done I believe that what Taubes is saying is reliable and makes sense.  I'd definitely recommend reading that and [In defense of food](http://michaelpollan.com/books/in-defense-of-food/) by Michael Pollan.  My personal take on all this is:  * There is significant variation between people.  The only way to know what works for you in particular is to try eating a certain way and pay attention to how you feel in response. * Most of what we have been told about dietary fat and cholesterol for the last 30 years is wrong -- both in accuracy and in motivation.  Taubes tells this story in detail in his book and in some lectures available as [online videos](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=AVvZP2av5Mk&amp;feature=related).  [This guy](http://www.cholesterol-and-health.com/) has interesting things to say about the science of cholesterol in the body.  * You don't need to eat a lot of carbohydrates or grains.  The official guidelines that you should also appear to be questionable in their accuracy and motivation.  You can if it makes you happy, but they are not essential.  Many people follow diets that cut out grains and high glycemic carbohydrates (like potatoes) and do fine.  Guests on [this podcast show](http://www.thelivinlowcarbshow.com/shownotes/) have a lot of interesting things to say on this topic. * I personally think how contaminated the fats are from how an animal is raised is a bigger factor than people realize.  If people in a study eat factory farmed meat, how would you distinguish whether it was increased saturated fat or increased toxic residues which was responsible for any negative effects?  I do eat meat (including red meat), butter, eggs, cheese, etc. but only from animals that were raised by people I trust to not use chemicals, antibiotics, etc., to raise them on pasture, etc.  I also eat wild alaskan salmon.  * I use ghee (clarified butter) for cooking and flax oil for putting on salads.  I eat lots of foods that naturally contain oils: meat, eggs, fish, dairy, nut butters, avocados, nuts, etc. but nothing else for added fats.  I used to use olive oil, but got concerned that it's susceptible to oxidation damage and I don't know of a good source that I trust to handle it properly. * I've seen enough people whose opinions I respect say that other types of extracted oils -- corn oil, soybean oil, canola oil, etc. -- are bad news that I stay away from them.  These are sometimes referred to collectively as PUFA oils.  The main issues seem to be that they have a bad impact on omega 3/omega 6 ratio (the idea is to try to maximize omega 3 and minimize omega 6), and are bad news wrt oxidation damage.  Chris Masterjohn has a lot to say on this topic.  * Eating lots of veggies and fruits generally seems like a good idea.  Their effects are complex and some people have problems with some of them (I, for instance, have issues with nightshade).  I try to eat the ones I know I can eat safely as much as I can manage.  * Eating processed food and fast food seems like a bad idea for many reasons and I stay away from them.  Michael Pollan has good things to say on this topic.  I know that not everyone can manage the time and logistical complexity that this entails, but it's probably going to help to make an effort to minimize them.  Anyway, that's where I'm at in my exploration of this topic.  Ultimately everyone needs to comes up with their own answers.  Good luck with your own journey.  The fact that you're consciously thinking about these things and trying to figure it out puts you far ahead of most.  Let me know if you'd like to chat about any of this.
Oh *I* will. And *you'll* be dead by then. *Mark my words*....
Ok how about this... Construct a funnel/urinal device that empties directly into the bowl, and the seat is no longer an issue. I know that you won't do this, because you're already to lazy to lift the seat.
No, I am the one in the green hat. Sorry I'm kind of tired, forgot to clarify.
just today?
He's also denying himself biodome!
TED IS black
The opposite of a sausage fest is a Cave Rave. I got incorrect directions and showed up to a cave rave. They locked the doors.
Not in all cases.  Sometimes, something like Ritalin or Adderall simply helps you focus and get off your ass and get your work done.
4 is fine, but maybe you can post pics that you didn't take in your room. Do you have any action shots?
You still have access to source code, and really, the people who would modify the code are the people who jailbreak their phone.  The average user just wants to be able to use the program, and doesn't give a flying fuck as to whether or not they can modify the phone. They are content with the closed nature of the app store, because it ensures that they get a secure experience.  Personally, I have a jail broken iPhone, and I agree that we should have the ability to modify code, but what about the people who have no idea what GPL, source code or FOSS mean?
Well some old guy told me that they weren't, and for some reason i just couldn't help but trust him. Thinking back I'm pretty damn sure those were the droids I was looking for.
What did you expect would be left of an aircraft that hit the ground at nearly 550mph? Did you think the plane would be intact? Did you? Do you have any rational reason at all for believing that the plane would be intact? Did you even look at the pictures? Apparently not because all of those articles did have photographs of actual debris found at the crash site. If you're not seeing the debris it's because you don't want to see it.
I'm not sure a sign is convincing enough evidence for me...
Well at least there's one cancellation!  What happened to the debate with him anyway? Did he Derp? Or just Herp?
how...many times did you touch it before replacing or cleaning?
It's an apocalyptic novel. Basically, it's sometime in the future - widespread desertification, water shortages, global warming, etc. There's a planet everyone thinks can support life. China's manned shuttle returns and within 48 hours the entire government has pulled out of the country for the new planet. Economy breaks down, panic, looting. The US realizes they need to head out too before the government is overthrown. They have limited space so there's a process of being selected for the shuttle. The story itself is through the eyes of three people.  That's it in a nutshell. I've never really done something like this but I'm excited. There's a bunch of details I obviously didn't hammer out but I guess I'll figure those out in the re-write. 
thanxxxxxx
What a surprise you have no black friends to play the demoman. 
IT'S TIME! IT'S TIME!  **SEEEEAAAAAAATTTTTTLLLLLLLLLE**
Wave failed because they couldn't describe it in a simple sentence.  You need to be able to describe things in the manner of "It's like [this known thing] but [differentiator]." if you want the larger market to buy into your idea.  It's not surprising Lars is moving on, it must have been crushing to put so much effort into something only to have it squashed.
Apparently no one is this subreddit is interested in having a nice discussion. First, the 2006 Palestinian elections were closely monitored by the International Quarlet On the Middle East (EU, UN, UK, Russia and the US) and yet, people voted for the party that was most hated by those forces. Still, no one doubted the results. But that's not what we're discussing here.    Morocco is a liberalized autocracy. No different from countries like Jordan, Kuwait etc... A quick look at all Arab states will reveal that all of those countries are ruled by outdated authoritarian regimes backed by Western countries. It doesnt matter how bad you think Democracy is, it cant be worse than these kinds of governments. Morocco is blessed with a political and cultural stability, one of the fastest growing economies in Africa, a multi-party political system and a significantly more liberal society than most arab countries, all which constitute a good environmental for any young democracy. Sure, a complete political reform will be required but the outcomes will definitely be worth it. We live in a country where publishing a poll about the king is forbidden, freedom of speech is a joke and 200 million dollar from tax payer's money is spent on the royal family every year. You're fine with this ?
Did you notice that in the last scene (1) the kids (a) appeared not to have aged, and (b) were wearing exactly the same clothes as in Cobb's dreams?  Moreover, did it occur to you that the totem wouldn't work for Cobb anyways, given it wasn't his in the first place (RE: it was his wife's totem)?  Did you also notice that all of the other characters had to sequentially kick from one level to the next, but this rule somehow didn't apply to Cobb and Saito (who missed all of the kicks, and somehow kicked out from limbo all the way to the plane)?  &gt;We knew it was reality, don't insult our intelligence.  &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
oh because HIV and Hep C wasnt a good enough reason not to reuse needles
Check out Cave Story.  (The Miraigamer translation has a Platinum rating on winehq.)  If you had to grow up playing hard games, your kid should too!
You're an atheist attending a Catholic university? That sucks.   But I'll say this in my defense: I'm 25 years old, and I've seen a LOT of assholes and hypocrites. Really, really, really fucked up people. I've known parents who beat the living fuck out of their children and guys who date-rape and worse. The vast, vast, vast majority of seriously fucked-up people I've met in my life are religious. I am *wholly* confident in my disdain for religion and the people who choose to follow it.   Of course there are exceptions, and of course people who don't believe in a god or gods can be and are fucked up as well. But the vast, vast **VAST** (DID I SAY THIS LOUD ENOUGH, MOTHERFUCKER?) majority of the really REALLY fucked up people I've met in my life are religious.  So, no, I'm not going to look at your professor who rallied against the bishop who hates gays and say "Oh, how pretty! A Catholic who isn't a dumbass or a pedophile!"  Maybe it's because I live in the bible belt, I don't know, but people are fucking horrible. NO, REALLY, THEY ARE. And the only thing I hate worse than a pedophile is a pedophile hypocrite, supported by hypocrites, who then claim to have a *moral high-ground* and defend the pedophiles. Yes, I'm looking at Catholics.   Again, no, I don't care if I lose karma here and I don't care that there are exceptions. There aren't **ENOUGH** exceptions. So, go ahead and downvote away, I have enough karma to take the hit. I just can't stand people like you either, who think that they are special because they can see a Bishop shun homosexuals and not be angry about it. Well, I can't. Fuck that Bishop, and every single Catholic who saw him and didn't stand up and fucking yell the moment it happened. Fuck every Catholic who didn't leave the church when they found out about the child-fucking, and the Vatican covering it up. Fuck you and your theology professor for letting it happen because it's against some dogma to stand up in church and speak out.
* The Tag Team titles should be considered a first tier title. The TT division is pretty much dead.   * Go back to a Mature rating since there's nothing PG about fake fighting.   * Longer matches that resemble more of a Japanese strong style. I know it's pretty much impossible, but ego's need to be checked at the door and losing shouldn't be a big deal since it's fake anyway. Just put on good matches and people will pay.   * More Japan. Bring in talent from Japan and make it sort of like how the UFC integrated the Pride roster. A Yakuza angle is too predictable. Push Yoshi Tazu, having him bring in his "friends" from Japan, put the tag titles on them with a Freebirds type style rotation and then have guys like Punk, Danielson, Bourne and Low Ki join them to make a run at singles titles. In the short term, put them in spotfests to gain popularity. In the long run, have HBK come out as their "mentor" and he'll put them over saying how when he came in he was considered too small and he ended up being one of the best. Everyone loves a "Rudy" story.   * Less Dusty finishes.   * Less women's wrestling... for the time being. I say put women's wrestling only on one of the programs (RAW, SD or Superstars) and start to filter out the bad talent so that the roster is solid.  * Take a page out of Dana White's book and stop worrying about win-loss records (or jobbing in WWE's case) and talk about how it's a fight and anything can happen but as long as it's competitive and entertaining the wrestler will always have a good billing.   * More heels.   * Less interference with GM, owners and the like. You may see Dana White's face a lot but he's always talking about the company and his roster of talent. The WWE's GM/owner characters all seem to be out there to make wrestlers miserable. Have them initiate their feuds on their own more and the heat between talent will seem more believable instead of seeming forced. You don't see David Stern making up rules and changing who's playing who in the NBA mid season. Keep the sport in sports entertainment.
You're absolutely right.  Nuclear fusion processes do increase the overall disorder through the release of EMR.  I don't doubt that all of these processes must be increasing entropy in some way.  Gravitational collapse, for example, can be said to increase disorder by releasing gravitational potential energy in the form of kinetic energy.  It just strikes me as odd that, in the course of increasing the *overall* entropic disorder, the universe actually has a tendency to increase the apparent order of its material aspect.
The most impressive part is that the costume actually allows her to remove her head from her body
Then you get funny looks from people who have no idea where worcester is (nevermind pronouncing or spelling it)
I realise now I am a victim of verbal abuse. She makes me feel worthless so that I cannot leave her, long after she has left me. 
not sure if it's quite what you're looking for, but [Heavy Horses](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HDYK5SBnVaQ&amp;t=1m10s) is what i'd suggest.   edit: the more upbeat bit starts at 3:35  if you don't want a 9 minute song, a [shorter version](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XaWLwVO0pdE) also exists
[](/melvin"just wrote my thesis, problem?")
[You could just link the actual image.](http://farm2.static.flickr.com/1086/5129699637_5809acb4c3_b.jpg)
It's nice that you don't push your beliefs on others, but surely your behaviour is influenced by the inspiration or guidance you receive from god? I just noticed how much your previous post is being downvoted ... shame on anti-theists downvoting someone just for believing in god
Remember to tip if it was properly shaved.
I wouldn't want it for Flickr. Most of the time when someone deep-links a Flickr pic, I rage because I can't see context or the photographers other pics.
&gt; Oh noes, the mean man is pointing out the actual real-world consequences of my inane libertarian philosophy. I don't know the history of my country, and I can't defend my policy stance. The cognitive dissonance hurts my head. Mommy, make him stop!  FTFY
I love his ears...but yes the smell. He sometimes chases me with them. Gross, but I get him back.
i nearly had a heart attack right there.  but then i was all (づ｡ ◕‿‿◕｡)づ
God dammit, you're giving me cavities.  Also, more Calvin love: my pumpkin today...  http://www.flickr.com/photos/pxtl/5133922544/  http://farm2.static.flickr.com/1362/5133922544_af9d67b8ba_b.jpg
I happen to know quite a few multi-millionaires, but I highly doubt they would be interested in opening a bar - especially with someone who has no experience running a business.  You're pretty much fucked until you can finance it on your own.
Your blow is my mom.
You suck. Haha
I agree
Never give crazy a website.
Well, for one, binary branching helps capture some descriptive facts that ternary branching doesn't help capture. We know there's more structure to a DP (NP with a D tacked over it) because we can see this structure by replacing different things in it. A pronoun replaces a whole DP, and 'one' can replace NPs.  * the brown dog =&gt; it * the brown dog =&gt; the brown one * that brown dog =&gt; that one (definiteness and one-replacement is a little sticky in English).  This can be brought out a bit in other ways, too. 'One' in the sentence below can either refer to a red firetruck or just a firetruck (although there's probably a preference for one interpretation over the other).  * Maria wants this red firetruck, and Tommy wants that one.  Interpreting these facts, you get a structure sort of like [(DP) the [(NP) [(AP) brown] [(NP) dog]]]. Sticking all of 'the', 'brown, and 'dog' under one NP node doesn't allow you to capture these basic descriptive facts since 'brown' and 'dog' aren't a unit.  There's some theoretical reasons that come to mind readily as well. Allowing any number of elements on the right-side of your rule gives you the opportunity to create enormously powerful rules which don't seem to obviously exist in natural language (it's an empirical point whether they do or not, but evidence suggests no). Binarity limits the complex of the theory, which is a good guiding principle for theory building. Within words, we don't typically see n-ary branching --- words seem to have binary branching internal structure. And, as a conceptual idea, putting two things together is a simpler process than putting together n things.  Binary branching is the norm in syntax these days, since there's some good theoretical as well as empirical reasons for accepting it.  (As a side-point, binary branching falls out of the theoretical mechanisms that Chomsky uses, but as far as I'm aware he's hardly the first to propose it.)
Hadst I a hammer, wouldst I hammer in the morning. Wouldst I hammer in the evening, all over this land.
I'd like to know why you use the term "christmas" for your genitals.
No. There's at least one other thread that I've seen full of redditors that think just like you.
He must work out.
That's entirely wrong. I hope you realize that.
I don't like fishes watching me fap, no thanks.
Great News!
Man, that's a lot of hate.  I don't understand the need to be such a douche to a random person online.  You aren't just giving constructive feedback, you are trying to tear them down emotionally.  What's the deal?  Are you a sad person? Do you get joy from hurting other people?
The old 9V Mindstorms motors, as pictured at that O'Reilly page?  I'm actually doing that right now.  I'm using a standard motor shield.  I got a couple of the Lego electrical cables, cut 'em in half, stripped the wire, and screwed it into the motor shield.  They are just simple DC motors, and things work great. I got my motor shield from EBay, but I'd recommend the Adafruit motor controller instead.
MMHMP! HMHMMFF!
machinery of defense fuckwad. If you are muslim you **ARE** they to me. That SHOULD be **OBVIOUS** to you.
Samantha Bee and Jason Jones
I'm a grammar nazi, but I feel like trying to correct others is a little pretentious. When I peer edit papers in class, I go ape shit on them, and then feel guilty, and then leave nice comments so my classmate doesn't feel bad. 
As Jon Stewart himself said on Larry King, "Liberals are petrified of even being *suspected* of racism," and given the liberal bent of Reddit -- so long as some brown folk out there are Muslim, there *will* always be craven apologists.  (Jon's thing is a paraphrase.)
What just happened? Lost the stream!!!!!  EDIT: Back on for me.
I've had them on my bike for almost 2 years. I ride my bike Daily to work and back and used to get about a puncture a week. Since fitting the Supremes I've found I have less rolling resistance than the last tyres and have only had about 4 punctures in 2 years (one of them was a 6 inch nail).  Definitely recommended. 
Yes I notice quite a few more in askreddit and IAmA, my guess is its just 1 butt hurt redditor. 
I used to till they told me my blood was essentially useless to them.  And that I should go donate platelets instead.
I saw, "So, I just picked up a Desert Eagle for home defense, and..." and I thought, "This can't be serious."  Then, I saw, "gold-plated" and I knew before I even opened.  I literally LOL'd.
That's good to know. I'm generally ok with stuff like that, but the first response to my questions was someone calling me a troll for (as far as I could see) no good reason, which put me on the defensive for asking genuine questions (that maybe coulda been worded differently, but how am I supposed to know cultural faux pas from a completely different country?) and having basically everyone respond hostile. 
Yeah, "reddiquete" lol, but if it makes you feel any better, I didn't downvote you.
Your friend needs to move on.  You need to make a move.  You should have a chat with your friend about how you've actually liked her for a long time but never did anything about it because you respected him.  Now you'd like to see what happens.  If he tries to act like she's his, he's being delusional, and you should try to call him on it.  He might not like you for a while afterwards, but if he's a true friend he'll get over it, especially since he already tried and was turned down.
I know a girl that always uses that font...
I was sporting the cutting-edge [Canon AE-1](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Canon_AE-1).
Minecraft: colonizing the hell since yesterday.
It was but it's a lot easier to say it was a liberal circle jerk than to acknowledge the real diversity of the crowd.  If someone would've shoved a microphone in my two friends or my face like they did in this video you would've heard something more along the lines of "Fuck the mainstream media, Obama isn't hitler but he isn't god but the republicans are so awful that even conservatives can't vote for them."
"Punctuality is the politeness of princes."
[This one will kinda put you in your place and shows how "important" your entire crusade is.](http://mississippifarian.files.wordpress.com/2010/03/screen-shot-2010-03-29-at-9-03-28-pm.jpg)
Weird - the apartment block closest to the camera looks like some mid 90s video game, really low res.. getting some flashbacks here.
I had an amazing reading experience while high reading Philip K Dick's Martian Time-Slip. Three consecutive chapters in the book (I think around 8-9-10) are all about the exact same event but told through the eyes of each character in the scene. The way it was done was mind blowing at the time because I was too stoned to realise what was going on until about halfway through the second consecutive chapter and then I was in awe from then on.  
Wow that gets me really excited......   .....to watch them lose to the Sounders.
Yes, sandstone wears quite easily, but I guess whether it works better than tarmac depends on how well the microbes bond the sand grains together, and also on how cheap it is. Maybe if it is cheaper to lay and resurface then the increased wear rates will not be that bad.  After all, I think a lot of resurfacing is due to weather-induced damage, and also in urban areas, a lot is due to excessive amounts of roadworks.
HEY EVERYBODY. THIS PERSON HAS A ROOMMATE!
Certainly - and in ways that you can predict and explain.  But noone has down that for this particular nerve.
I know, I was disappointed, SMP is the next thing Notch is gonna work on though I think :)
Would you trade a set for the demo's stuntman?
Where ya at?
I can't think of anything to ask, but just wanted to say, thank you for your hard work.  I feel like a janitor/custodian receives the least appreciation.
If I'm actually a marketer (which I'm not, I'm a web developer), then at least congratulate me on the longest campaign in history. I've been here 3 years, taken part in both secret santas and contributed Reddit logos. All for a phone ad post?  Nope, I just found it cool.
Almost as much as I hate telling people to move along.
Classic photo, Fergie and Beckham.
Easy. Ricky Gervais, Steve Merchant &amp; Karl Pilkington.
Especially considering his/ her username ... they really are a no good liar.  Exceptional play.
I happen to live near Detroit and see that they have a huge Masonic Temple. I love architecture so can anyone just go and visit these Freemason Temples?
What do you think Papal is for? ;-)
You should keep in touch with your friends, dude.  It's hard to build friendships when you don't have the structure of uni, when everybody's married and so forth.  I was just like you when I graduated and I regret not keeping in touch with my friends.  It gets pretty damn lonely.  Then again, I've gotten pretty good at dealing with it.
What is with all the fuss clang has been getting lately.
&gt; I don't understand what your syllogism is supposed to represent here.  It was explained clearly.  &gt; The middle ground fallacy is intended to show that the compromise between two opposing positions is not always correct.   Then call it what it is:  a false dilemma.  &gt; The fallacy is in assuming there are only two positions and that the truth must reside in the middle.  That's called a false dilemma.  &gt; Perhaps you've made a mistake in your first premise because it is false that there is always only one (or two) extreme views.  It's not my premise.  It is assumed true by your own reasoning, which has been proven invalid.  The proof is why the premise must be false.  This is why logicians use calculus.   When premises lead to a false conclusion, logicians question the premises.  It is false that there are only two views.  Thus the phrase "false dilemma."
I know a few dealers. Some are great, some are awful. Guess which ones get my business...
Have you any idea how many billions of dollars are lost each year because of insects and how harmful to the environment current solutions are? **BILLIONS**
God fucking damn it. Off Air again? Sigh.
&gt;&gt;take a girl on a date  &gt;The wife would get pissed.  Your wife isn't female?  What a progressive society we live in!
It was fucking retarded.  It was 0-0.  You have a defense that can potentially shut other teams down, so what do you do?  Give away 3 free points?  For a team like the Jets, 3 points can be huge.  Plus, it was a LONG way to go for the first.  The play went nearly perfectly and still didn't make it. Fucking stupid.  
Yes.  I did so last Wednesday.  
so since Obama has not done shit but stick with Bush's policy on national defense we should applaud Bush?
Thank you =)
Make sure you check the bottom of your car for the next few days, fella.
&gt;the kids (a) appeared not to have aged,  Aged from what?
I want his voice to make love to me...
Asians are such hard workers...
Carrots? Don't you mean waffles?
&gt; When you add NSFW to the title the thumbnail (which shows said nude) is not shown and the header is marked in red as NSFW.  TIL something new.   As an aside, and to change the subject slightly, am I the only one who thinks that surfing reddit while at work's a bit off? I'm the boss so I can look at whatever the hell I want, when I want, but even so I limit surfing news sites/reddit etc to break times otherwise I'd never get anything done.
Operating system?
It sure sounds like him.
I am the liquor Randy. 
Not the Red Grapefruit Juice, but when I get straight Grapefruit Juice it is always only grapefruit juice from concentrate and always from Florida, not Mexico, etc.
I WAS LIKE, BACK TO DIGG WHAT?
Haha, RapidShare updated their site finally...  Anyway, this seemed to work. Thanks.
Sweatpants on a girl are hot. You must be gay.
Estarcraf! Staru koraftu!!
I swear to god my cat knows when I'm high and wont leave me alone.
It was for cab fare.  
It doesn't usually work like that, in that there's not one thing you say and someone goes "I see the light!".  It's more like "wow, you've given me a lot to think about".  Then they go away and deconvert *themselves*.  People come by here all the time and thank us as a whole for helping in their deconversion, but they almost never point to one thing, or one person, that was central to it when they do.  Many people I have had discussions with have subequently deconverted. I may have had some effect, but I doubt I have ever been the single crucial factor.
&gt; I did some cursory research on this, and found that there was a schism in within Freemasonry in 1877 after the Grand Orient de France decided to allow atheists into their lodges. Apparently the "Anglo" lodges no longer view this organization as legitimate. What do you think of them?  They're clandestine lodges.  &gt; Whatever your opinion on the matter, it seems strange that you wouldn't even mention this group's existence. Are they simply dismissed as "heretical" (or something to that effect)? Do they not count?  In my opinion, no. They don't count. I choose not to address the issue, because to me, they're not "true" Freemasons.   This is just my opinion, and your mileage may vary. Always wear your seatbelts. Avoid drinking alcohol or operating heavy machinery while reading this opinion. If an erection persists for longer than four hours, see a doctor.
Every. Fucking. Time. NEW MECH WARRIOR GAME?!? FUCK YES! &lt;clicks link&gt; sonofabitch.
Event Horizon.  Like if being stranded out in the middle of space isn't scary enough, you are being haunted by evil spirits from another dimension that know all of your fears and weaknesses.  Its also tastefully gory too, so you get a good mix of horror and terror.  This movie changed my life.
Yep.  I'm not a fan of sexting laws, especially when used against minors, for private images they didn't create as pornography.  But this guy is not a minor and he solicited the image and with what sounds like pretty pornographic intent ("bottom is better").  *Edited to add:  the line is pretty blurry but I'd say he crossed it and then some.
It is meant to be deadly serious.
Modern "horror" movies, anything associated with Tyler Perry, and spoof movies are typically the only things that make me not watch. I'll give any movie that doesn't look like a steaming pile of shit at least 15 minutes to flesh out characters and plot, and if it's not holding my interest after that, I'm done.  Also, romantic comedies, or any other movie that follows the stereotypical plot for the genre to the letter.
I can't believe that you can't believe that.
What do you mean?
Wow. [Best Of'd](http://www.reddit.com/r/bestof/comments/dz975/this_is_what_happens_when_you_just_read_the/)
How do you even make that typo? Dvorak keyboard? 
It just so happens that an extraterrestrial adolescent tried to ride me last night. It was awkward, but I don't think he meant any harm.
[This](http://www.newscientist.com/article/dn2121-painless-needle-copies-mosquitos-stinger.html) &gt;Unlike the smooth surface of a syringe needle, which leaves a lot of metal in contact with skin tissue, the jagged edge of the proboscis leaves only small points in contact. This greatly reduces stimulation of the nerves, says Aoyagi, causing far less pain. That's the gist of it. Less needle touching nerves = less pain. The article says their needle was quite brittle so they needed a way to stop it breaking under the skin, which is dangerous.
There are literally several places you can stream from right now.
Quite the contrary, it was Kayne (in the Chomskyan tradition) who said trees should be binary, and Lambek (in the non-Chomskyan tradition), and both were taken quite seriously in their respective traditions. All Chomskyan syntax, and all Lambekian syntax, is binary branching.
Even better is to drink them, refill the bottles with water and shove the caps back on, oh man that would rage my sister back in the day ....
Other peoples reaction maybe augmented.
That's actually a really good rendition of the outfit and taunt. Kudos to you, good sir.
google is funny.
no, i just meant  &gt;caverns of fire await you  is true. cause i'm about to play minecraft. high as fuck.
No I don't use the pee hole.
Hey, my boyfriend and I didn't take a lot of pictures, but we were in a lot of group pictures, and a lot of people took pictures of us. This is us http://imgur.com/iU59L.jpg. Does anyone have any photos of us? 
A commercial? You posted a fucking commercial?
I tried EZTV, but it crashed when trying to show me all of my torrents (1000+). Transdroid doesn't crash for me. I guess I know which I'll be using.
Julia Roberts from the beginning of Pretty Woman?
very good.
Humor and rape, just a couple of peas in a pod.
That's a bitchin' picture bro! You kind of look like me.  It looks like you were going for the casual look with only two pooped collars.  Nice!!
****SPOILERS**** &lt;&gt;The film opens with Cobb (Leonardo Di Caprio) in Saito's (Ken Watanabe) version of Limbo. As I understood the film Cobb and Mal (Marion Cotilliard) get control over their version of Limbo because they were architects. Saito was not and was simply caught in his own delusion.   (Limbo does not have to be a thing of darkness because it is not the Catholic version but a slang term to describe the state after experiencing false death while in the machine induced dream state)  &lt;&gt; I totally agree with this point. I think it distracts us from the point of the film and was a gimmick at best.
SWM is an acronym for Single White Male. There could be another meaning that he is using though.  
The bundles make burning them easier.
Two months? Wow.
I see what you did there.
I thought his performance was actually quite fitting for the rally. I was a bit apprehensive when they announced it, but I say "good on them" for making it happen. 
I'm sort of with you here.  It _is_ sort of sad that this event was a marketing gimmick, however, on the other hand, the people that were influenced most by it (the allegedly unaware passengers) probably had no clue it was T-Mobile that did it.   All they saw was the a whole crowd of people singing happy songs to them after being on a plane for god knows how long.  
12k viewers.... scratch that.  14+k viewers will do that to ustream.
Bangers?
So you were misquoted twice by a reporter, as were some people you know, and by extension that means that I am neither diligent nor accurate? How on earth is that fair or logical?   ...I'm not saying mistakes don't happen or that some people out there in every profession aren't miserably incompetent. But again, to paint with that broad a brush is as misguided as it gets. It's the precise mentality that allows racism, sexism and xenophobia to thrive (though to be clear I am not saying that you are exhibiting either of those traits). 
Yes girl, work.
You sound like a bitter, frustrated civil servant.
Try the Oracle of Ages/Seasons titles. They're made by Capcom, but they;re super-fun. You can beat one, use a code in the other, then take another code back to the first to continually link and unlock more stuff. Plus, you can get a giant flying blue bear named Moosh. How cool is that?
That's why I include a link to the "ladywonderlux" comments page, so you can read her comment history in all subreddits. I put that same warning on about 3 other troll messages she posted in other seddit threads. Consider it a general warning of 2xc troll activity. Even if some messages were less trollish than others, they are all disrespectful of sedditors and attack pickup in general. This person is not reading seddit to contribute to the community. She is reading seddit to look for opportunities to tear down the community. That is what trolls do.
&gt;Actually, I'm going to argue with 'insightful'. At least I'm enough of a photographer to know that to claim "...really not hard to take a picture of..." only shows a complete ignorance of the art/science.  Sure, I agree. I'm not the one that made that comment.  But instead of primping your ego, how 'bout you share you knowledge about what makes it a good photograph. 
RadAway to be added in next update.
So sexy! Do you do some kind of workout or how do you have such a nice stomach?
How short?
I think this is the only way my parents would be OK with me sleeping with Bob Dylan. 
&gt; the energy is a product of the current multiplied by the potential.  Bzzt, wrong. That is power. Multiply it by time and you have energy.
Thats shitty. It sucks when it happens.
Wow.  Calm down.  Did it ever occur to you that adamiaz posted the song titles simply because he/she thought that people might have enjoyed the music and been curious about it?
Not until tomorrow! 50% off!
SKYWALKER
Awesome!  Is there any more back story to the tradition?
Not entirely true actually.  Red giants can produce elements up to lead.  It's a lot slower than in supernovae mind you.  Almost 50% of all isotopes heavier than iron are formed this way.  [S-process](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/S-process)
no.  this is exactly the problem.  "what makes sense to you" is not an answer.  to some people, the idea that there is a creator is what makes sense to them.  In much the same way that you can look at something and think it weighs 100lbs because that makes sense to you, but in reality it weights 1,000lbs.  The origins of the universe and many other concepts that require understanding beyond our capacity do not get answered by "what makes sense to you".  They have concrete facts and theories formulated around those facts.  So much of the problem with having these types of arguments is that people just want to attribute what makes sense to them because they're scrambling to try to explain something they couldn't possibly explain without post graduate degrees in subjects they have zero understanding.  
I have a couple of projects I need to do official writeups for, code and schematic dumps too... any suggestions on how to go about this?
Who downvoted this simple, uncontestable, factual statement?
thejared
I don't notice a difference in sauces but I opt for jarred. Like what was said above, bpa is no fun.
I don't think there's another option other than JS. But for what it's worth, I've found that NoScript really isn't that widespread as you might think. On a couple of sites I monitor only about 1% of visitors have scripts disabled.  If you're worried about it just put in a &lt;noscript&gt;Please whitelist us to see great typography&lt;/noscript&gt; and call it a day.
I don't donate blood I donate platelets. You get hooked up to a apheresis machine for about 2 hrs. Its better then giving blood cause you get to lie down on the comfiest chain in the world while you do it.
Nothing. I'll WATCH anything, but there are many factors that make me not like what I'm watching very quickly. Pretty sure they've all been listed here.
I think it is possible to love someone and not know it - or rather *appreciate* it - but it's still curtains for the relationship.  I've been in that situation myself, and she was my soulmate, we were perfect together, but she was also my first girlfriend and I was basically too immature or not ready for permanence.  That was the most valuable relationship of my life so far, but I can't regret leaving it. I was similarly half-assed about ending it, BTW - I think that's characteristic of the situation. 
In the nose?
mirror please?
Sorry the beard is gone. 
I was seeing an unemployed drug addict (my weakness). We were having a fantastic time, hanging out every day, making plans for the future, and being generally adorable. But we hadn't yet gone all the way.   We're at my house, on my bed, and naked. I grab his cock, about to go in for the kill, super stoked to be sleeping with this guy I'm totally into. He freaks out, stands up, and starts putting his pants on, saying "I can't do this, I can't do this. Don't hate me, don't hate me." He then proceeds to tell me that he has a girlfriend of three years, and he can't be unfaithful to her. He left me stark naked, in bed, in the middle of the night. My heart shattered.   Later on he broke up with her and tried to win me back with songs and apology letters, but that initial shock was the WORST FEELING EVER. 
Anyone else completely joyous about this ruling?  I've long felt that the patenting of any genetic material is a slippery slope. We certainly don't need the profit motive replacing natural selection. 
Being scared of needles is one thing.  Nobody likes needles.  I've tried donating before, and I pass out.  I pass out every time I have a simple blood test.  It's a condition called vasal-vagal syncopy.  So, if you suffer from this too, and pass out whenever a needle is inserted into your vein, then I empathize.  If you're just being a pussy, though, then knock it off and go donate.
Anyone know how to disable the awful highlighting of new IMs now? It looks like garbage.
I didnt get it? Is this a bad thing. What would happen to reddit?
Notice how they all covered this rally, but ignored the Beck rally last year... Way more people at that one.
It's these guys: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=g5X7ztdd_6E#t=3m1s
I am both on mumble and in the channel.
Not an irrational fear of cars, no, but when I'm on the highway in my little hatchback, I tend to give the big trucks and trailers a very wide berth. It's not that I think there will certainly be an accident; but that's no reason not to be cautious.
It definitely does, but that may be because the way that we (anarchists) would have set things up - in terms of modding - does not mesh well with the prescribed Conde Nast style.  We are trying to use the tools we have to make for a better anarchist hang-out, and its proving rather tough.
Except they don't have anything behind the customer service desk.  And you don't have to show ID.
&gt;Something I should of mentioned is that I think what is happening is that both sides are reacting to the extremes of the other side.  That's a fair point, but mine is that the two extremes have different levels of following and power.  Code Pink are mocked for cuddling up to Islamists and Hugo Chavez.  The Tea Party are winning elections.
"What's the name of your label?" "Top Five Records!"
Lamest thing was that fucking van falling through the air. 
I thought you'd only add new crests to the bottom of the sprite, so the other crests stay in the same position. Why would you change the background position of the existing crests?
Hey now! What do you have against Valley Fair? I'm from the Twin Cities and that place was awesome! It's better than where I live now (Omaha) which has no amusement park.
you just made a post about the meme you fuckwit [](/son)
It Worked, you bastard...:-)
No, it's a choice between evil and fantasy, and Obama chose evil to preserve the fantasy.
Now there's proof I exist.
If you can't like something on their profile you shouldn't be their 'friend.'
Why yes, yes i did
It's the absolutely, officially confirmed ones, necessarily some fraction of the total. 
Oh wow, ok so do you have any idea if President Obama is in the Freemasons?
So the police, who turned up carrying arms and armour, did not cause everything they claimed to prevent?
There are two factors that I feel are the most important for oral: position and spit, lots of spit.  Really helps to have a sugary drink to help with that, as sometimes you're parched during foreplay.
No. I disagree with you. Everyone with a voice has forgotten that they are Americans first, and Republican, Democrat, Liberal, Christians, Conservatives second.   This was a large mass of people who don't feel that way, who showed others that there's people who are normal and aren't polarized. It's a slap in the face to all the polarizing voices in this country, telling them it's not going to work on everyone.  It's a great start, and I think that it sent a message that you can be pissed off about the country, but you don't have to get on TV and cry about it (like Glen Beck), or blame it on other people. Or whine that the economy is dying because taxes are too high.
Jules on Cougartown needs this.
&gt; since birth  No you weren't
&gt; Moderates do not follow such laws in the Qu'ran like:  Actually the evidential criteria required for such a conviction is so high that it is unlikely to ever occur. The prospect of punishment primarily serves as a social deterrent against publicly blatant acts of adultery. Muslim extremists just ignore the high burden of evidence required by the Quran to reach such a conviction and make up their own.  &gt;What is a "moderate atheist"? The only thing atheists have in common is a lack of belief in a deity. There is no atheist dogma, there are no atheist rules, or recommendations on how we are to punish evil doers.  Atheism is the irrational belief that God does not exist. The belief itself carries significant philosophical and ethical implications. For example, as the existentialists noted, if God does not exist everything is permissible. Its no surprise then that the worst atrocities and genocides in history were perpetrated by atheists.   &gt;This is an old slander. Stalin and Mao didn't kill and murder in the name of atheism or because they were atheists. What would be the point?  That's just trite "new atheist" apologetics. Stalin and Mao killed and murdered to create an atheist utopia free of Religion. As mentioned above, they thought everything was permissible to fulfill this goal, including genocide and mass-murder. This is why atheism is so dangerous.
"Like a great eternal Klansman With his two flashing red eyes Turn around he's always watching The Washington monument pricks the sky With flags like pubic hair ringed 'round the bottom"  [Dead Kennedys - Stars and Stripes of Corruption](http://www.azlyrics.com/lyrics/deadkennedys/starsandstripesofcorruption.html)
Then leave the gym, fire the lawyer and add to Facebook. 
I don't disagree with that, I'm just pointing out that my first reaction to seeing the makeup of the crowd that was actually aired was that it appeared to be similar in race demographics to Beck's, which I thought was a little sad.
[The city of saints and madmen](http://www.amazon.com/City-Saints-Madmen-Jeff-VanderMeer/dp/1405033967/ref=sr_1_1?ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1288569619&amp;sr=8-1) by Jeff Vandermeer or perhaps something by Italo Calvino?
It wasn't Chomsky, it was Kayne and Lambek.  Thanks for playing, tho!
That motherfucker past-me is always creating issues for future-me, but what can future-me do except fuck over future-future-me? That's not exactly revenge. 
[relevant](http://www.ebaumsworld.com/video/watch/456286/) (start at 1:42)
Just like the appendix! Oh wait: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Vermiform_appendix#Possible_secondary_functions  Hey, let's just stick to science in this subreddit as per the subreddit rules.
maac doo naald's
Take up pot!
Go with her the next time and ask him if he could work out a few kinks you're having. Tell him you hate to ask (which is probably true), but you'll gladly give out his business cards as well.
1. Bloody Mary  2. Gin &amp; Tonic
that's not true. depends on the dorm. I only share with my neighbor and i'm in Fowler (north side)
&gt;Also any scene in a demon/ghost/werewolf movie where some holy person has an ancient text describing all the facts about these creatures.  I really liked that in one of the leprechaun movies, a character just went to the store and got all his weaknesses from "leprechauns for dummies". 
One day I'm going to make a treecomic using these. Saved. 
LMAO
Stack 20 Mechanical Infantry.  ???  Profit.
I don't know why you are being downvoted.
Well, I suppose you could kinda make it work for you in that instance, though.  You could inject *near* the lady bits, which hurts less than actually *in* the lady bits, and then just hope it's close enough to lessen the pain if the piercing.   Warning: I have no idea what I'm talking about. Consult a professional, don't try at home, blahblahblah.
&gt;What I'm saying is that whatever solution we come up with, it shouldn't be mandated by the state.  Your avoiding the question because you don't have an answer.  You are just making an argument for a perfect Utopian society.
If by that you mean a lot of young people lie about what they really believe in order to fit in with the crowd, then I think you're right.   I would have had some questions about your time apart from belief in a deity and eventual reconversion but I guess it doesn't apply since you weren't really an atheist.   Cool AMA. Cheers!
when you get there, the Gaucho Locos are where you're gonna wanna be.
Yes. I don't see a need for tilt-shift.
Yeah, me too. Was getting worried if I had some sort of trojan spambot on my computer but it's not only me apparently. I'm in Austria and on UPC.
It wasn't mcfadden today. :(
Eli Roth. 
Sabes, siempre habra gente que se pica por cualquier cosa. Es una lastima, me acuerdo que lo mismo paso conmigo con FB y amigos Chilenos estaban super ofendidos con los Chistes que hico Colbert sobre que "No fue la primera vez que ayudamos a Chile" (con lo de Pinochet) y mis amigos le decian "Gringo culiado" y lo que sea.  No se, hombre, yo creo que todo el mundo necesita un sentido de humor. Especialmente con Colbert con la bandera, mi imprecion que si, cuando entro fue haciendo broma de la situacion pero con la bandera Chilena y todo fue sinceramente un tributo.  Pero en fin, siempre habra gente que se ofenderan sobre cosas.
It's not, I was at a wedding a few months ago and the best man's girlfriend only knew the members of the wedding party, no other guests.  So while the wedding party was off doing all the wedding party things like pictures and dinner she was stuck at a table with complete strangers.  She was really really miserable, and I wouldn't invite my SO to a wedding when they didn't know anyone and I was busy as a groomsman.
It should also be noted that [The Bill](http://thomas.loc.gov/cgi-bin/query/z?c110:S.1175.IS:) was *designed* to be waived by the president according to his/her discretion (CTRL+F "National Interest Waiver"), that the scope of "Military Aid" is exceptionally broad:   "none of the funds appropriated or otherwise made available for international military education and training, foreign military financing, foreign military sales, direct commercial sales, or excess Defense articles by the Foreign Operations, Export Financing, and Related Programs Appropriations Act, 2006 (Public Law 109-102) or any other Act making appropriations for foreign operations, export financing, and related programs"   And, although it has been listed below, here is quick breakdown of the aid:   1. Yemen - Fighting al-Qaeda. Yeah, everyone hates this idea.   2. Sudan - Building "Military Institutions" in the south. The south of Sudan is about secede. In this part of the world, that is suicidal if you have no defenses.   3. Congo - "Helping the military become more professional and less abusive." A touch of cosmic irony here, but sounds good to me.   4. Chad - "because of its role in fighting terrorism," *and* "assistance with the humanitarian crisis in Sudan" (See #2, the one that's about to implode in January.),  *and* "helping that country's military end its practice of using child soldiers." Terrorism aside, these are good reasons.   I seriously doubt anyone in this administration (or the previous one) actually *wants* child soldiers. But the moral choices are never as simple as we make them out to be. What exactly is southern Sudan going to do with boxes of medial supplies and food when the north comes to slaughter them? What would Chad do as they help out? What exactly is wrong with helping the Congo's military become "more professional and less abusive?" Etc, etc.   The absolute moralizing and title-based reactions are just brainless conclusions and automatic thinking. It is *not* that simple. 
The way you phrased it seemed insulting, rather than a "its this"
Dude, you freaked me the fuck out... not cool man...
My penis is hilariously oversized.
Yeah! Who has ever learned anything interesting from the internet? 
Just because you can't see it doesn't mean it doesn't exist. Have faith :)
Stocks will go up as they usually do after mid-term elections:  [link](http://www.investorplace.com/16524/midterm-elections-send-dow-t15000/)
*I will.*
There is absolutely no way that an elite athlete would hold back on giving a peak performance just to "cash in on bonuses," especially when a world title and/or record is on the line. Sports are evolving all the time and an athlete improves by getting stronger and refining their technique, not from some calculated ploy to maximize their bonuses.
How many popped collars is that? Three?
I thought you meant the pee hole in the dick. I was like "yeah I pee out of it"
why sex high is amazing
What if we live in a very liberal district and our "conservative" republicans are actually moderates that reflect our views better than the ultra-liberal democrat?
Dohohohoho
Someone's been handing out the stuffed brown envelopes round at the lonely planet I think.
I was there! Great party!
We got a German here who wants to die for his country, oblige him! 
I'm with ya. Attended for about two years and the BS meter was going off from the beginning so it never sunk in and then I rejected it completely by 8 or so. 
Would you also accept John Wilkes Moooooooth?
You're right around the corner from me. I'll keep you in mind in case I ever find someone who'd like coffee as a gift.
I assume that you live outside Utah?  Most Utah Mormons seems a little more uptight then your wife sounds.
Blogspam.  It's apparently true though.  [Snopes has it.](http://www.snopes.com/photos/natural/maiken.asp)
In case any of you are wondering where I get all of my cool links.  I mostly get them from [Bret Contreras' Blog](http://bretcontreras.wordpress.com/). He truly loves this stuff, and that is why I follow him everyday.  There really isn't a day that I don't check his blog for new posts.
Make an omelette with all of those meats in between with some pepper jack cheese.
&gt;I got absolutely blasted for the comment.  So?  You made a stupid comment and got downvoted or something, get over it.  Sounds like you're the one with a hurt butt.
&gt;When did it become a rule that you need to answer questions immediately?  Tuesday, actually.
Yes and to go with your train of thought the fact that Turkish building codes are not followed and thousands can die in an earthquake is also justification for suicide bombing.  Don't let me stop you from being emotional about your 0.0001 percent chance of dying from a terrorist attack.
He's from Stratford Ontario, a town known for its thespianism. This is going to be a fantastic acting performance.
That's partly due to the nature of the tests. Most AP tesst have at least a couple of essay sections that must be read and graded by multiple people, who are actually reading for content.  Sure, the SAT now has an essay section....but its pretty much graded on a simple scale of 'is this kid literate? Is this kid writing on the correct subject? Is this kid coherently answering the question?' and that's it. 
Took me until "if I had a vag" :(
I'd do Ash. Edit: I never cared much for baseball, but baseball shirts make any male who wears them immediately sexy.
Holy shit. Leave. Leave now. This is revolting. Please save yourself.
Her name is Joanna Newsom, and I do not appreciate you speaking about my wife in such vile terms.
Well i don't know, graphics are a bit shit init?!
that's a brush-off, like a lot of your replies in this AMA
I entirely agree! I have the /longest/ name in the center of the universe with two middle names and a hypenated last name. &lt;g&gt;
[she's hot!](http://www.spankwall.com/#!/capri%20anderson/1)
ditto.
The guys at the top usually aren't stupid. And today the news claimed the packages were intended to blow up the planes. Except there are big flaws in that story, suggesing further this was all security theater before elections: 1) there was no battery in any of the photos. All that electronics and no power source. 2) the bomb claimed to be triggered by cell phone. There are many technical problems with putting an operating cell phone on a plane as a bomb trigger to blow up the plane, such as a) all cell phones broadcast a signal frequently and periodically and so they are easily detected in cargo  b) the battery would run out after two days in transit c) the ability of a cell phone to receive a signal in the cargo hold of a plane is small and unreliable because of other cargo as shielding  d) robocalls for donations to mosques inadvertently triggering the bomb. (just joking there)
I don't use it... it's faster for me not to
Off air here!
your name makes me wish I had a rack of lamb.....
That looks kinda like Boomer, anyone know who this is?
You evil motherfucker. You just about gave me a heart attack!  Good thing I'm in a line for fried chicken. 
Moncler Uomo, 2010 New Moncler Men's Jackets online, Find moncler outlet and Buy moncler uomo jackets, All mens fashion jackets is 20% off, free shipping.
Can't it be both?
[Vaguely phallic, right?](http://images.google.com/images?hl=en&amp;q=chapman+stick&amp;btnG=Search+Images&amp;gbv=2)
Most two-bedroom flats in central London **are** unaffordable for hard working people at the moment, says a redditor.  The aforementioned redditor also said early analysis had confirmed fears many London boroughs would remain "largely unaffordable" for these people from 2011, and a "significant further amount" would do so by 2016.  Boris Johnson branded the redditor an 'insensitive clod' for suggesting that it made more sense for people who don't even work in London to not live there than for hundreds of thousands of people to commute long distances in misery.  Said redditor can be found on one of the commuter trains tomorrow morning, then later on the tube/sauna... if it's working... surrounded by many, many more people in the same situation who also have families and desire some sort of quality of life but cannot afford both that and living in London.
Yeah dude never buy through ticket master unless you have no choice and are dying to go. On another note, I was pretty disappointed with his latest special. It was funny, but I didn't think it was as funny as first half hour special on comedy central. And sorry that made me sound like a hipster.
Pull down technique here.
but i didnt touch anything but my pen*ohhhhhhhhhh* i get it.
It makes me wonder if such sad lovely music could be made by a person who wasn't ill.  I'm sure he had many more great songs inside of him.
So he is not a witch?
Is that some kind of starfighter hyrogliphic? I've always thought the Jews were space alien hybrids, maybe the muslims are too? Only it didn't really take with them for some reason.
DAMN, THOSE ARE SOME TELEKINETIC POWERS YOU GOT THERE. I HAD TO GO TO A PLASTIC SURGEON TO UPGRADE MINE. (I'M NOT STALKING YOU JUST SO YOU KNOW.)
As much as I love Bill &amp; Ted's Excellent Adventure, it works on the concept that everything they've done in the past already happened (e.g. Ted steals his Dad's keys and leaves it for them, they tell themselves after the presentation to make a tape and leave it behind and don't do the parallel universe where they don't have the tape distracting Ted's Dad) so then that removes ALL the tension and point in quickly going back in time to get them to pass the exam. Awesome film.
Hate to break it to you, 18-21 year olds who smoke WOULD vote if it was marijuana legalization, and those who don't generally wouldn't.
&gt;Our unmanned drones are operated by the brains of children sloshing in a nutrient bath.
Downvoted for "Leftards." Way to take the high road.
&gt;Jane Austin  &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
I think I read somewhere that "The First Cut is The Deepest" is actually about female circumcision and "Peace Train" is about Hitler's final solution. What a monster.
I live in Hong Kong and I see shirts like this on clueless people all the time.  In fact, it has been a dream of mine to carry around a camera everywhere I go and compile enough snapshots to make a book.  The best one I saw was an old lady (really old, probably 80's or 90's) with a "My dick wants to buy you a drink" shirt.  That would be the cover shot.  
I got you.  I don't think it's always as damaging as people make it out to be.  It also really depends on the situation.  Like I have said with rape before in relation to feminist argument, there is a big difference between being gang raped in a prison shower and getting shit faced drunk and waking up with a ugly bitch on top of you...neither are good, but I would choose the ugly bitch any day of the week. I think with this it depends on many different factors, like whether the person was awake or drugged and what sexual acts actually happened.
There are rumors that the Black Ops campaign actually includes a connection to the zombies.
I think most beers generally taste better on tap, but every once in a while i have a draft beer that just tastes *wrong.* Its not skunked, but it tastes bad like the bar kept the keg tapped too long or something.
Didn't see the rally, but people often change their memory of certain events to feel better about themselves. That's human nature.  What Cat said back in the day did not sound like blinding hatred, but tacit acceptance other another's opinion (he said, "unless we were in an Islamic state and I was ordered by a judge or by the authority to carry out such an act - perhaps, yes.") which is a much more frightening and mundane facit of many, many religious devotees.
Just to be clear, there was no plight. Just immense disappointment. Luckily for us it worked out. But take a guess as to how many go through this very thing every day.  What more could he have done? He stole the money and broke his contract. The people charged with assisting vulnerable people had no way for us to protect ourselves.  He could have done some physical harm and then maybe the cops would have come by and told him not to do it again.  If people are evil, non mainstream regulation meant to protect people against that evil just doesn't matter.  [Edited: de-over-generalize comment about regulation and clarify about plight]
Are you serious?
Trying to waste time?  C'mon, we (supposedly) broke the world record for largest wave!
I do, all the time. Why assume I don't? That's hardly fair.
Unfortunately, trolls are like entropy; their numbers in the universe always increase, and there is little we can do about it. 
Avast says trojan threat has been detected.
I still use the Shockwave Flash 10.1 r85 for Firefox. It lets me pull videos from /tmp.  I won't be upgrading, and hopefully something better will come along by the time it stops working.  P.S. _I hate you, Flash_
When was the last time you had a proper shower?
No.
what do you reccommend other than grass? It seems most blocks would just seem unnatural
I agree with this.  Buy your kid a Nintendo, they've got AAA titles that are family-friendly.  The Wii console sells used for very cheap on Craigslist.  Not only will it play all the modern games, you can also download Virtual Console games and play Gamecube games on it.
[Wrong address sorry :P](http://aozora.jugem.cc/?eid=1671)
It's not real phone sex. I don't fake moans or anything. I just tell them what to do.   It's just like if you go to a dominatrix in real life. There won't even be nudity on her part. It's sexual, but it goes much deeper than that. 
[true](http://www.reddit.com/r/atheism/comments/dy13j/ive_finally_realised_that_atheism_is_as_much_a/), and [true](http://www.reddit.com/r/circlejerk/comments/dxnk3/im_an_atheist_and_i_saw_someone_dosayeatthink/)
&gt; I've heard that Freemasons are generally just old dudes who like to play a bit of golf and help people through charity and that they just like being part of an old boys club. How far from the truth is that?  Honestly, it depends on where you are. Some Lodges are populated by the older set, some by the younger, some with an even mix. Mine is an even mix.  &gt; I've always been interested in the Freemasons, they seem a grand bunch in my area.  I'm sure they are.
Both of the contenders viewed abortion as a public health issue, and José Serra even enacted some measures on this matter while Minister of Health.  Also, I think both of them were at least agnostics (probably atheists), but for the past couple of weeks both were battling over the religious voters.  I count that as a "win" *for* the Church here...
One other critical thing to a successful switch to Linux is not to pitch things that Linux can't deliver. If you get anyone to help you (and there will certainly be people who will volunteer to help you make your case), make sure to vet them.  I don't know why, but there seem to be a fair number of people who have the soul of a used car dealer, and have gotten into advocating Linux. They will say whatever it takes to close the deal. So if someone says they need a system that does X, Y, and Z, these people will tell them Linux does those things, better and cheaper than Windows, even if they have no idea whether or not that is true.  So you end up with people, for instance, who know that a small publisher or two has used Scribus to publish a book or magazine, and then will tell people that Linux + Scribus will be an easy replacement for, and with all the capabilities of, Windows + InDesign, for a large professional publisher. They'll pitch Linux + GIMP as being better in all ways than Windows + Photoshop. They'll pitch whatever came with Ubuntu that they used to edit their family vacation movie as being on par with Final Cut Pro or Premier.  Let one of these people on your team to pitch Linux, and you are going to have a failed migration.
Lakers please! this is an amazing nba season...really excited to see how everything plays out :)
Fun fact: since I've been forced to watch Home Alone 30-40 times since the beginning of the summer, I noticed that one of the Mcpoyle bros played the pizza deliver guy
I've always thought that the concept of a global flood myth origin is silly.  Think about it: do we really need a massive-scale catastrophe (such as a regional/national/continental/global flood) to take place in order to make a culture believe the catastrophe was indeed, global?  To a man living thousands of years ago, a regional flood may seem as if it did cover the whole world, particularly when people in that age very rarely traveled far enough to know of any world beyond the flood plain.  Given the size of the Ark, and given the amount of species in the world, it's easy to see that the Ark myth was intended to impact a man that had not fully grasped the scale of the Earth.  Chances are, if you're a human living in a non-migratory civilization, then you live around a body of water.  Chances are, at some point in time, this body of water will flood.  Is there any wonder as to why the flood myth could be so universal?  Floods are so damaging and so massive, that it would seemingly require a god to do (at least to an ancient man).  What baffles me is not where the stories come from - that's obvious.  It's the fact that people still literally believe these stories - that fucks my shit right up.
It's right here in my hands-free wine glass! I'm wearing six of them!
I just looked up and down for an Event Horizon reference, didn't see one, made my own, and then I accidentally hit Page Down (like that ever happens?) and found this comment.  Fucking Halloween...
Whenver this topic comes up I'm always reminded of Kurt Vonnegut's complaint about marriage: "You're not enough people"
&gt;I feel "potential" with three of them, meaning I'm completely comfortable with them, both speaking and in silence, and also share a lot of interests and activities. It helps if you don't take things out of context to confirm your own opinion.
well done, I def shit myself.
What I want to know is why this is sponsored?  Did this guy spend money to get this to show up on my frontpage?
**I N J E C** Oh fuckit
Neither do I, but it makes a lot of sense.
Huh, I just threw up. Not in a bad way, it just happened. I'm glad to know others vibe that way with x too. Ima get some molly for TAO on new yrs.
Ha!  I wouldn't have posted if I wasn't ready for them!  But...seriously...412 downvotes for a kid throwing a peace sign?  
Usain Bolt on Top Gear - http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FDiz24mjOUg
Tordek says you're wrong, DreamingOfBananas. What say you?
I disagree about the meal plan. Get one if you live on campus for sure. 100 or the 150 is good
&gt;Less women's wrestling... for the time being. I say put women's wrestling only on one of the programs (RAW, SD or Superstars) and start to filter out the bad talent so that the roster is solid.  They could improve the women's wrestling easier and faster than they could puroresu-ize the WWE. The best women's wrestler in the world said she'd take a contract as soon as it was offered to her with the WWE. I don't think you're going to hear that from KENTA.
DON'T FUCKIN' DO THAT  Jeez.
It's insanely different from a cup of coffee.  
dude, that's not safe
Yes.  My best friend.  Short story:  I **politely** answered his questions about my disbelief and treated him as an equal which let him put his guard down.  I stated my beliefs as a matter of conversation a few times to get things started and then laid it out when he asked.  Also, referencing *God Delusion*, *God is Not Great*, etc. and offering to loan them out helped a great deal.  Remember, be patient and respectful.
Did you convert or did you "convert?"
technology
THE STREAM IS DOOOWWWWWWWWWNNNNN 8pm east Back up 8:07
You should just calm down a bit.   Reddit votes are no way worth $1 each, so I can't see a site like that lasting long.  You've posted a link to that site numerous times in this thread already, maybe it's you who's the shill, trying to gain google rank on your scammy website (see how easy it is to play the tin-foil hat game).  I have no problem with viral ad videos if the video is of something I found entertaining and the fact that it was sponsored is made pretty clear.
&gt;You've made it clear that any misogyny should be outright banned,  Look kid I never said that.  You really have no idea how to argue or what a logical fallacy is.  You have yet again made another straw man to attack.  You also made another logical fallacy called a *sweeping generalization*.  You have no idea what I think about misogyny.  I said burkas should be banned because they are dehumanizing not because they are misogynistic.  Also, you should realize that the down-vote button is not for comments that you disagree with; it is for posts that do not add to the discussion.  I am not downvoting you because I disagree with what you say, try and be courteous and do the same.  Anyways, I hope when you get to college you take a few logic classes.  We are done, have a good one.
That idea made me go, "Ewwwwwwwwwwww!"  I am the kind of person who starts with a stack of towels, I wipe and toss them in the *kitchen laundry basket*...lol!
Why didn't everybody just pick up after themselves?  I think after the Beck rally (which seems to be used as a benchmark for how clean the place is afterwards), nobody else had to clean up because the people who were there generally picked up after themselves to begin with.  It's nice that some rally volunteers stayed after to help this weekend though.
Nuh-uh.   They are just organizations. The same is true for many, many things. Their goals are not similar. They are simply groups of people. 
I wonder if anyone has an autoflush urinal at home. Anyway, what WOULD BE worthwhile is a dual mode flush with different intensities for solid and liquid waste. They are all over europe and they save a lot of water! 
Control Panel &gt; Administrator Tools &gt; Computer Management &gt; Disk Management : check to see if it's listed here
You realize that many people shoot like that? The thought process is that you leave your pointer finger along the edge of your middle finger. By pointing at the target with your finger and shooting, you have greater accuracy than just pointing the gun.  Granted, it's useless in the situation of that picture, but it's completely reasonable practice used by many police and military personnel.
It's sort of in between being a start up and a long established company. It's not terribly old, but it's not a start up.  I don't think the "average" CS grad can compare to me.   The biggest difference, I think, is that when I have a problem, I look for ways to solve it that make sense, are efficient, solve the problem thoroughly, and have minimal impact on the rest of the system. I think a grad is more likely to apply overly complex solutions, or solutions that just don't really make sense. There's a saying about hitting screws with a hammer or something.  Aside from that, there are also things that you don't learn in school. The social skills needed to succeed (i.e. figuring out the real requirements), how to make good designs, never reinventing the wheel, and so on.  It's my personal opinion that people whose careers are in academia have no business teaching people who are going to go on to be software developers, so I kind of look down on graduates at first glance.  As far as I know, we aren't hiring at the moment. I'm usually not aware of when we're hiring, aside from someone asking me to look over code samples or answers to questions. Some older and more skilled applicants might be offended if I interviewed them.
As a person who is not an Ephebohpile, I do believe it should be lowered. Same with the legal drinking age. But then again I am very liberal   I feel if someone is sexually active and agrees to willing sex , then it shouldn't be against the law.   I find it hard to comprehend how (for example) A women could drive at age 16, but not be able to consent to sex.  If you can drive a car, and have the lives of others in your hands, then surely you can consent to sex . 
I like it but agree with the sentiments on re-evaluating the color scheme a bit. Also, I feel the the tab buttons should have a light edge instead of the shadow. It makes the buttons feel engraved when it appears you wanted to go for something more embossed; though I could be wrong.
No comment possible either. I just can't process what's going on.
That is what it was put there for. I sure as fuck don't pull my pants down at the urinal. 
Yes! Add me
Perfect answer. I've been doing individual monster initiatives for my games, but every now and then I accidentally skip not a monster, but a player as a result of this. Not good at all. Switching to monster group initiative has help loads with that issue.
Nice legs OP ;)
I always go weapon/armor over shields first and save shields for mid to late game upgrades. I do this because for the price of the shield upgrade you get both the +1 weapons and the +1 armor. Voidrays are far from completely useless at that as well.  They are still extremely strong and I've actually still been using them and you can still successfully rush them if you need/want to. All protoss air is not useless, just used incorrectly.  Phoenix are good for harass/scouting due to their speed and if micro'd correctly you can kill muta's easily. Voidrays are still very good and very useable, the nerfbat was not hard on this unit. Carriers are extremely underrated, and the mothership is just the best air unit in the game. Roach hydra is an easy counter, go collosus / immortals with a stalker heavy army.
* 1) Only stupid people post to yahoo answers. * 2) Only tech-savvy smart people post to imgur. * 3) 1 and 2 never combine?
Hmm, you're right.  The hole his undead-brother is sleeping in at the end, is clearly in the forest.  The hole his living brother is digging is at the house.  And he's digging it during the night.  Yet, his undead-brother is sleeping in his hole at night. There's clearly a The Prestige thing going on.  His brother was actually twins.  One brother is undead, and the other is still alive.
I think its more like the 600th Repostman.
THIS THREAD IS NOW FOR MATURE AUDIENCES ONLY
Yes it does greatly. I have a hard time with that. My best friend (more like a brother) is trans gender, and many of my friends back home are GLBT.   Some times I think I want to stop because of that. But I realized also that most of the money does not go to prop 8 related activities. Most of it goes to actual good causes and charities.   I dunno.. Its not a perfect world and god knows the church isn't perfect. Like I said, it is important to my wife so it is important to me. I try not to think about prop8 to be honest. I just vote and donate to the No on prop 8 campaign. 
oh sorry and Dustin's mom... was.. uh promiscuous ?!  And her Grandmother who raised Dustin contacted me when he was 14.  Because his mother had the other possible fathers tested. I said that I was okay with he letting him know and that we could test too if needed, but I was okay with filling the role, glad to be his dad. Then things fell through and don't know why.  I was married and across the state.  I think maybe my wife at that time may have done some things, maybe intercepted mail or screened calls too.  So don't even know for sure if they are bio, but I am okay with that, wanted to open the door and give the options.
The costumes wouldn't have been complete without the sweat. Well done.
Just leave it there. She'll start using it when she feels like it...
Yeah, I'm not with her. 
MEEP MEEP
Thanks, now I'm hungry.
He was trying to make hash oil, pretty standard method. 
Note to self: dress in drag for next year's costume parties.
This meme... my socks and i do not approve.
Firefox -&gt; User Agent Switcher -&gt; Googlebot  You get the full thread. I wish google would ban that website for giving google users a different experience.
I disagree.  I'm not naive enough to think that there's a difference between any of the world's religions.  I think that there are significant similarities with respect to the strictness that both Catholicism and Islam (as well as a few other religions) teach that leads to rebellion against it -- especially if there's an alternative view offered in the surrounding culture of that religion. When you're in the Middle East and growing up poor in a Shaira community and all you know is that world: you have no choice but to follow Islam.  Same thing if you grew up poor in a country like the Philippines; strictly Catholic and no other exposure to any other view, that's all you know.  
Not that taking advantage of someone is ok, but you shouldn't be getting that drunk to begin with.  You have only yourself to blame if you get raped in that situation.
Let's go Rangers!  *clap clap clapclapclap*
Did anyone else try to click the "Most Recent"? Shudder.
As I was reading the header the REM tune *It's the End of the World As We Know It* started in my head, but with *the World* replaced by *Reddit.* 
Isn't the serial for iphones/ipods also in the about screen?
Not very far really, 1/2" max. This was the first time I have done a pumpkin like this - It was easier then I figured (pixels help).
Same :(
Damn. Does it make a different tone for the first beat of a bar? If not maybe I could just count differently depending on the signature. It's mostly to practice my rudiments anyway :).
I'm a woman but thanks. 
Pete does a good job of rating the California state-wide propositions. He has biases and is clear on what they are. He also does a good job of explaining, sometimes humorously, what the propositions are about, so that his support or opposition makes sense, according to his lights.  http://www.peterates.com/index.shtml
Fullmoon Bongzai, Esoteric, and Menace Ruine. Essentials.
It's more of a lacking of details, here the bot's page: http://overmind.cs.berkeley.edu/
&gt;Don't know, never watched Caprica.  Neither has anyone else!  Ba-zing!
My friend has to shower afterwards. It's werid and funny, especially when he's late for work because he had to shower and you know why he had to shower.
"Americans" live in the safest and most peaceful time in history.  Its the other countries that need to watch out.
What error message?
I think everybody is missing the point.
That seems like a fair deal, but I don't have a merryweather any more. Sorry. 
Fuck his mom.  I can think of no better way to humiliate a guy.
All Shriners are freemasons.
The article starts off "I’ve read a few articles lately (like this one)[http://rubylearning.com/blog/2010/10/07/do-you-know-rubys-chainsaw-method/], advocating the use for the method_missing method in Ruby."   The post he references was by Paolo Perrotta the author of Metaprogramming Ruby, easily the best book on Ruby in the last few years.  He wrote an article on RubyLearning.com for newbies that gave a couple of common uses of method_missing. He wasn't "advocating" its use in all situations, just giving some examples when one *might* want to use it. And tons of commenters (know-it-alls?) jumped on Perrotto's case giving x and y edge cases where method_missing sucks.  I really doubt he'll volunteer to write any more free essays to help out Ruby beginners after that fiasco. 
That's basically how I saw my first boob.
Not all men are. Not all women are. Rape comes about in a couple of ways. In normal society it's usually some power thing. In other cases, it is out of sexual need. In other cases, it's some other reason all together. I assume you have gotten the reasoning from every rapist ever to be able to claim that? Defending rape and claiming the reasoning behind some, and thus presenting a way to lessen it by providing for a sexual need are completely different.
I'd really push trying for a MMF. Tell her how spoiled she'll feel. Make it all about her. I'd try to find someone that's into the idea of an ongoing thing that's bi or bicurious as well. Then about the 2-3 'date' I'd start to play with the guy.  You totally have potential for making this work, maybe even making it seem like her idea.
He did.
is it legal to use man string instead?
Reddit. You should check it out, pretty cool site. 
If I go and I see that it is mine. Should I:  * Take it and leave quickly  * Leave and call the cops
cant wait for the third
Butter chicken, aloo gobi, rice with some cumin seeds and cardamom pods, and roti. Works every time!
As I was saying in [the other thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/apple/comments/dz50o/casesleeve_for_macbook_air_116/), the [SleeveCase](http://www.sfbags.com/products/sleevecases/sleevecases.php) is pretty cool.  Choose the flap and shoulder strap, and you get a messenger-style bag.  Or choose no flap and no strap, and use it with any old bag, or a [Muzetto](http://www.sfbags.com/products/muzetto/muzetto.htm).
So those pills really work!?  What is he taking?
Good job :) Varsity deserves your business! Its such a pretty venue. (I live 3 blocks away) So when you go to the concert you should yell "reddit" real loud. Hahaha.
Cannot unsee!
Download Unlimtones from cydia.  It is an app that will download ringtones directly to the custom ringtone section on your phone.  Also it uses the audiko library so its basically like using the website.
See the problem here is, he thought that passive aggressiveness would solve the problem. What he should have done was just wait until you stole another one of his beers and then while you were taking a little prissy sip he should slam the bottom of the bottle hopefully knocking out some of your teeth and replacing it with the common sense THAT YOU DON'T TAKE A MANS BEER WITHOUT ASKING FOR PERMISSION FIRST
Google is a good place to start?  I googled "Rally restore torrent" and got this bad boy:   [http://www.torrentroom.com/torrent/2849127-Rally-To-Restore-Sanity-And-Or-Fear-2010-HDTV-XviD-sHoTV.html](http://www.torrentroom.com/torrent/2849127-Rally-To-Restore-Sanity-And-Or-Fear-2010-HDTV-XviD-sHoTV.html)
Ah, thank you. I'm not crazy...at least with regard to this single subject.
Upvote for Weeds reference.  Even if the writing has gone down hill.
  But fluorescence is the process in which a photon of one wavelength is converted into two photons of different wavelength.  When I look at the dot created by my 405nm laser pointer, the fuzzy halo effect around it is the same color as the dot.  Wouldn't the halo effect be a different color if it were due to fluorescence?
No, maybe the first 30 times someone posted this topic.
Based on [lucasvb's link](http://www.minecraftforum.net/viewtopic.php?f=3&amp;t=49256) elsewhere on this page, SMP fixes are the most important thing.  *"SMP is the current priority in development."*  My point was for something he must obviously hold as hugely important, he spent a lot of time doing other things. Those things might be good additions or not, thats a matter of opinion, but I think that it was also a means for Notch to code something he was able to enjoy, more than what was important. I mean, I'd rather code a hell dimension with floating jellyfish than fix niggling bugs in networked java, which as you suggested are harder.
&gt;an an alchemist
the kids not stupid language is changing
WHAT IS THIS?
&gt;Anglosphere = English speaking internet population.  It's generally just considered to be the "English speaking world", i.e. countries where English is used as a first language.  The Internet has nothing to do with it.
Good luck.
I wish I could see the replay again, I just remember seeing the penalty. Or maybe I was blinded by rage haha. Is it just me or do the Pats keep getting more stupid penalties than I'm used to? 
same if you decide to not have children. Every single one of your millions of ancestors decided otherwise.
It's an assholes fault you can't read?
You're looking at design from a human perspective.   Intelligent Design implies God.   God is supposedly perfect and doesn't suffer from a lack of resources or time.  That's the argument here. 
[spoiler](http:///je je je)
You should post that twice a week minimum.  
I picked up trash along the way while I was leaving, and tried to pick up some of the explosion around a trash bin where I left my bag, also tied so people could at least throw it away in there instead of on the ground. I can definitely say around the area of the mall I was at, the grass was really clean, a few guys were running around before I even got my trashbag out asking people if they had any. I noticed the further out we got, the more trash there was.  P.S. were those Redditors two women one with glasses one without?! 
Same, of course. Thus the awkwardness. 
so you honestly look at this thread and don't see all of the modding follows a pattern that downvotes without comment anything anti- T Mobile and upvotes without any fucking sense of the 'normal' voice of reddit that which is proadvertising and pro big companies gaming reddit for their own adverts and you just don't see it? I'm not claiming to have a list of the guys in here that are either working with or for some viral marketing campaign but if you won't admit that it's happening then you are for sure a part of it. So do you see it or not?
How did you command such a high salary with so little experience?  Does C++/C# pay better than Java or other languages?  Are you mostly a web developer or back end systems developer or what?
He will be receiving real life karma in the near future.
Why'd you have to bring up clam cakes?!  I just got over a 2 year hankerin for one! (Bostonian who went to high school in Barrington (*ducks*) and now lives in CA).
It's ok. I cried too.
pro tip; girls don't really know anything about how guys act, they pick up on a few really obvious trends but that's it
Ha, yeah I could tell you were serious, but I'd have to see it for myself, honestly. Would you say "almost all" grocery items?  I highly doubt Shop Rite could beat Wal-marts price on milk on a consistent basis for instance.
The ninth rule of fight club is EAT MORE CUPCAKES!!
I couldn't agree with you more.  Truly a working class hero.
Jesus, it's Halloween, let people share. Shit.
Thanks!
Easier than that.  If it's Linux, you can define command line arguments.  ZSNES is dead simple, just run "zsnes PATH_OF_ROM", it'll load the game automatically (the path is based on your home folder by default.)  It also supports wildcards, so if the rom you get has spaces in the name and icky version numbers, you can just give ZSNES the start of the name, like "zsnes roms/SMW/Sup*"  Simply set up a desktop shortcut for each game, and maybe give them appropriate sprite-based icons so he can recognize them.  And if that wasn't easy enough, I'm pretty sure you can set your emulator to be the default program to load your roms with.
It's a good thing my opinion is of more value than yours, or I'd be in trouble.
Just checked out Marble Hornets. Definitely nosleep tonight.
It's not industry standard, it's government standard. If the socialists would just stop trying to "regulate" industry, then someone will want to make a profit and invent a way to deal with toxic waste, and the free market will solve the problem. Right now, all the government regulations about what you can do with toxic waste make dealing with it too expensive, and that's why we have a problem. Come on. Next you'll try to say that taxation is a good thing.
[](/wtf)
I think the "why aren't there any straight or lesbian cruising spots" was fairly clever. Also, in his book The Hippopotamus, he was bringing it up as a subversion of the politically correct idea that women love sex as much as men.
thanks! Is it possible to get some Australian team crests? :O Whilst I do mainly support Euros etc..I'd rather have my Aussie team crest=]
Man, I hate watching shows where there's a guy and a girl sharing a nice Fruit by the Foot.
I didn't know about the hide feature, but I checked anyway. Nothing
Nice hat:  The guy is a douche pure and simple.  Might be time for one of my favourite sayings:  Don't ever wrestle with a pig, you both get dirty and the pig enjoys it. Short answer, walk away, smile, enjoy your life, there are better things to do with your time. 
Disney won an Oscar for that.
Don't you mean carrots?  HAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHA
I don't mind if you promote this subreddit and your own Movember threads over there.
&gt;No. Fertilizer isn't used to unruin soil. It's used for better growth, trollboy.  BAHAHAHAHAHAHA.  &gt;So you still can't cite anything.  Say it and I'll cite it.
From Megaman X.
It's easier to defend when you were born there and lived 18 years of your life there.
Registration is now optional :) You can create/download resumes without signing up now - http://cvmaker.in
Oh yeah I mean I don't expect him to fire him mid-season. I think making a HC and DC switch mid-season is too much. As much as I'd love for Phillips to be tenured there,  I think the second week 17 is over (assuming the Cowboys don't make the playoffs) Phillips gets canned. 
Used to. Before I knew I had the disease, I'd had a sore throat from what my mother and I thought was strep throat. If I remember correctly, I couldn't talk much and my throat had been hurting for over a week. The GP noticed I had a huge throat and referred me to an endocrinologist.
Neutral news would be CNN and BBC, what proves fox news is biased? are you mad? Have you ever watched it? If not, try it and tell me when they say 1 positive thing about democrats or Obama
Black Cat by Edgar Allen Poe, it doesn't help I have a cat like the one like he describes. ):
57kg kid punches 25+ tonne whale to death.  I mean seriously, this isn't going to happen, I don't think this kid interacting with the whale would have worried the whale at all. It should not worry us, I am an Aussie that grew up close to the coast, I've swam with dolphins, whales and sharks and all of those things could kill you if they wanted to.  I think my experiences brought me closer to my country, in a place where it's hard to be patriotic anymore, because there are so many nationalists.  Fuck off snivel libertarians.
Get out of Connecticut. NOW!
We should hang out.
It faltered in a number of key areas for me.  All my opinion, and some of it VERY subjective.  1:  Bland world.  There is a whole lot to explore this time, and it all somehow seems much more bland to me than the linear paths of Fable 1.  Perhaps it's the removal of any meaningful loot?  In Fable 1 there was always that carrot (sometimes literally) that kept you exploring.  2:  Somewhat childish story.  While I feel the story was presented in a more entertaining way than Fable 2, I feel it really focused on pure black and white morality.  Even the choices where you can do something really good seemed to have a equally black side effect.  3:  WTH is up with removing loot in RPGs?  Diablo 2 + LOD is still 40 dollars.  That whole game is based on loot.  Oh boy, a chest!  I get either a boring potion or POINTLESS gold.  Blarg.  4:  The 'leveling' system, if you can call it that.  Where are the cool unlockable abilities?  I have to spend guild seals (XP) to learn how to play Pat-A-Cake?   5:  The stores...  Why can't you just have a menu of what they sell?  You mean to tell me that merchant went to all the trouble of setting up their little stall to sell ONE potion?  6:  The menu system.  I appreciate trying new things.  Now, learn from the mistake.  Sheesh.  7:  I could not care less about multiplayer in these types of games.  I understand the majority do, but for me it's just wasted development time.  It's one of the reasons Bioshock had no multiplayer.  The developer wanted to focus on making a really good single player experience.  And honestly, most games that don't FOCUS on multiplayer just end up being wastelands after a few weeks/months.  8: The combat is SO bland this time around.  No cool boss fights, no big monsters that require agility.  I beat the whole game by pressing B for 3 seconds, then releasing it. The melee is a JOKE.  And the ranged is TERRIBLE this time.  Anyone else remember how fun it was to fight the big stone guys in Fable 1?  How to took some timing and skill?  All gone here.  The good?  I really enjoyed the packaging, and the trailer.  That's about it.
I never understood this question.  I love open source software, and I'm a linux user, but the problem with open source is "what if there is a bug".  I know from experience MatLab is a good product, and if there are issues there is a good chance they will be addressed quickly, or a workaround will be found.  With open source, I either fix it myself, find a workaround, or report the bug and wait to see if it gets fixed in a timely manner. I've used open source software that would quit unexpectedly, and it took almost a year for someone to address the bug.  However, for purchased software those problems are usually (I know there may be some exceptions, so let us exclude Microsoft.) taken care of quickly.
I think they are using this stream: http://www.livestream.com/sgcbiologic
I usually find most of John Cleese's stuff hilarious. But I didn't find this funny at all to be honest...It's probably better in context if it's a mockumentary...
There aren't any people in the middle of South Dakota; no one would have ever found your body.
can we stop calling everything a bailout please?
My aunt is an engineer at gm.  When asked about the volt she just laughed and said it was crap and a huge waste of money.
Avast says trojan threat has been detected.
Met my girlfriend on classifieds2000! [old school ghetto site way back when.] In 1997,  hah.  She had a picture of herself and her sister and I thought her sister was better looking.  This was in the early days of online dating, she just showed up at my door and I hopped in her car for lebanese food, then we walked in the park.  We didn't even kiss for 2-3 months, just hung out as friends.  Still together 13 years later, 2 kids.  No plans for marriage, never will.
Still use my 2007 earbuds bundled with the iPhone 2G. I keep them in my car now for "hands free" calling but I used them everyday for a year before that. I switched to the new ones that came with my iPhone 3GS because they were all pristine and white. I keep them in my backpack now as backups but I use some nicer earbuds now. Haven't even unwrapped the ones that came with my iPhone 4 yet but I think they should become my new backup since they're all nicely wrapped up. So in summary if you new two heavily used and filthy pairs of Apple earbuds let me know. 50% off sticker price. 
Aside from the point that the women vs. men debate is useless for anything other than jokes or trolling (and I did notice your username), I never said women were better communicators. But they (on average) are probably more involved (interest facilitates memory), presumably having more sensitive mirror neurons involved with empathy, engaging in a larger number and more subtle/complex forms of communication and being more advanced in reading other people. Also, communication and sensitivity to other peoples' emotions is assumed to have been important to the role of our female ancestors. Most groups function better when females are present but that doesn't mean your girlfriend isn't irrational and self-absorbed
Like many school subjects, math is useful for those whose careers depend on it and math is pretty useless for those who do not need it in their careers. An engineer will argue that math is very important but newspaper editor may disagree. 
Yeah same here. Maybe if we all press F5 at the same time it will come back on...
[Halm](http://www.google.dk/images?hl=en&amp;source=imghp&amp;biw=1440&amp;bih=685&amp;q=halm&amp;gbv=2&amp;aq=f&amp;aqi=g8g-s1g1&amp;aql=&amp;oq=&amp;gs_rfai=)
Liberals are wired? I knew they were robots!
Your cat will have a statistically longer lifespan, but the quality of life will be lower.  You're talking about extending life without giving any concern to the quality of it.  
When I think Lovecraft I think subtle horrors, not ones you see, with the notable exception of Cthulhu. In his stories the plots usually revolved around a man going insane at from what COULD be there, not what is in front of him at the time, I would love to see more games like that (Like Amnesia!).
Is there no help for the widow's son?
The process of treating gender identity disorder involves first a course of psychotherapy, the addition of hormone therapy under a doctor's supervision along with a therapist; and then finally the surgeries.  This diagnosis is simply step 1 in the course of transition.  It's not a stigma upon transgendered people, it's a recognition that this person does not identify with their biological body and will thus embark upon transition.   It's not an insult, and it's not a diagnosis of insanity.
&gt; limit screws are set once and then left forever That's what my bike shop told me recently too.  I guess I shouldn't be messing around w/ those screws.  (I've only done in a futile attempt to fix some rubbing noise.)
&gt; that's a brush-off, like a lot of your replies in this AMA  Yes, it is a brush-off. I would disagree that "a lot" of my replies have been brush-offs, however.   Just my replies to you.
Well, then why do you play this game of hers? If your ultimate goal is to get that love of hers, pining isn't the way to do it. She's disdainful of that sort of approach. I haven't a clue what approach would work, but don't let yourself be one more of those who gets strung along. You'll only end up wrecking yourself emotionally, and killing any chance of action achieving your aims. Certainly suicide won't help those ends.
If you like the Evil Dead trilogy, then Drag Me to Hell might be right up your alley.  It's the same brand of good-humored, hokey horror (and the same director, too).  http://www.imdb.com/title/tt1127180/
Stream died?
Left to right, front to back: Michael Bluth, Rita, George Bluth, Buster, (2nd row) Annyong, Stan Sitwell, Tobias as Mrs. Featherbottom, Lindsay Fünke, Lucille 2, (3rd row) Franklin &amp; Gob, Lucille Bluth.
I'm now smashing my face against a wall after not only clicking on that link, but reading the comments.
Yes babies are hearing their mother's voice in the womb, muffled though. It's more in the fact category than theory. Will be interesting for my child as my wife is Chinese, though we converse in English.  &gt;When I word isn't clear and doesn't carry a clear meaning that can be easily put in another language, this is much harder to do. So say you start using saudade. I completely doubt that it would have to you the same meaning that it does to me for example.  This applies for all words though. Great dinosaur comic on that here actually. http://www.qwantz.com/comics/comic2-681.png  I've argued with my own mother over the meaning of the word "but", which she for some odd reason claims negates what was said prior to it... This obviously isn't the case though: "the sun is shining but it's raining" does not negate that the sun in shining.
I don't want to talk about it.
Thanks, subscribed to your list.  I'm in the same boat as Einrath, never know which songs to search for.
Hey, science is making tons of advances these days. Don't give up hope, 'cause a cure may be just around the corner.
I suggest the [PC Decrapifier](http://www.pcdecrapifier.com/), it manages to root out 99% of the shit that OEMs pre-install on Windows PCs.
hah, thanks. It's pretty shoddy though. I might try again when I have some more time.
I never use it, in fact I have my wife sew it shut. 
love the jacket 
I see... but that only answers half of my question.
You should do an AMA. 
Cumming is acceptable.
Is it wrong that this is totally turning me on?
Of course the red in those photos is a false arbitrary color! In infrared, they look... infrared. We can't see the color most of the reflected light is in, that's your whole point, isn't it? It obviously isn't *red*, because we can see red. 
[](/omg "Fucking Melvin")
As someone who teaches "Hands-On Cooking Classes"...I agree with just about everything on this page!
Redzone Channel
I agree with fuckinhell.
LIKE MINE
Lovely. Let's go out for tea.
you need to lighten the fuck up...
&gt;Would it still be OK if Bush did it?  If those were the reasons, then yeah, I'd be okay with that.  &gt;Fix the countries issue before giving them money  And how do you suppose these problems would be fixed without money? Do you have a magic wand that will solve problems for free?
Yea :) California! Los Angeles to be exact. I have never met a Mormon from the motherland, but maybe you are right. 
What is the benefit of this?
Chitty Chitty Bang bang
wow, pure determination hahaha
Nope.  8 stitches though.
The percentage of people willing to identify as agnostics (this has been surveyed many times) is about 1.5 times that of atheists (ideintifying as atheists + agnostics is less than 5% total).
What do I possibly have to be mad about?  Animals have far greater physical abilities to compensate for their lack of brain power.  Humans have far greater brain power to compensate for their physical shortcomings.  I might as well argue that we take away every wild animal's claws, teeth, immense agility/physical strength etc. to make it even more fair.   EDIT: I won't argue the preceding though because I know that it is in fact, retarded.
Registration is now optional :) You can create/download resumes without signing up now - http://cvmaker.in
Release that shit back into the wild!
I never said people weren't selfish; I just implied they weren't necessarily looking to strip the hides off the working class just to make a buck. And knowing that people are selfish lends us an advantage. The mistake which is generally made is to cry foul and wait for some authority figure (God, government, parents, etc.) to descend and make it all better. I won't pretend I haven't had that same reaction to a tough situation before, but I won't pretend that hasn't screwed me in the long run, either.
I like the design overall. It is nice and simple. I like the over-line on the menu. Things I don't like:  1. Your 2nd level pages need to be more consistently formatted. I like how the accolades page looks. It would be good to do all of the pages that way. (contact page is fine) 2. I don't like the bevel on the ONUS header. How about a cut out (inner shadow)? Or nothing at all. 3. A really light drop shadow on your content box would make the page less flat.  4. You might want to use .pngs for the nav and header so you can have transparencies. Right now zooming way in causes [issues with your background.](http://imgur.com/lHpXt&amp;9buSU) 5. Your image on the accolades page isn't wide enough. There's a black gap.  [with changes](http://imgur.com/lHpXt&amp;9buSUl)
In my experience, girls find this incredibly complimentary, as long as you're not a jerk about it. Good luck bro.
On the left you have a 2010 Double Bastard and on the right the Lukcy Bastard. So indecisive!  Also, for beerporn haters, go on and hate. I don't mind.
"Age is really nothing but a number. That's something I've made up. Um, and I really think that's true."  Ok.. that woman had to have been a joke.
my ringtone is the new dr who theme and it is amazing how few really cool people there are out there. :D
Whoopi Goldberg,Rose Perez
[](/bepistrollingyoubetter)
Geek!
Nat Gas has probably dropped 50% since this acquisition, and I'm sure that while XTO's value wouldn't have been cut in half, its certainly not a $41 billion acquisition today.
Listen to JJJ on Australia Day...?
I'm already done.
Okay, I'm just going to say it: You are very pretty.  ... How can you possibly be a redditor?
Well thank you ! I will just have to assume you are an expert in those arena's and trust you know !
The double moral standards of you people are astounding. You accept homosexuals, but reject trolls. It's people like you who are an atrocity to society. It's no wonder people rape more than ever these days.
too bad he's ignorant about the [reach](http://www.cbsnews.com/stories/2010/08/25/eveningnews/main6805735.shtml) of the bugs.
_Social science amazing facts  :_   * Annually more money comes out of Africa (for debts and interests) than goes in (from international aid).  Furthermore, most of the money that comes in is composed of conditional loans : loans that must be spent buying products from the donor's country on projects that the donor chooses.  End result : international aid for the most part, as it is, destroys third-world economies, has little to no impact on the receiving countries and is usually used as a tool for countries to help out their industries by circumventing sponsorship and government subsidizing clauses in international free-trade agreements.  * food aid is often used as a economical weapon to force countries in to adopting certain crops or agricultural practices.   * Step 1 : send massive amounts of free food to country A who is in a hard spot (quasi-famine) but could manage with minimal aid.  * Step 2 : watch local producers of food crash and burn trying to compete with free food.  * Step 3 : send in the corporations to pick up the pieces and "reorganize" local agriculture. * Step 4 : ????  * Step 5 : profit!!!  Sorry if this is depressing. :S  BTW I use the expression "facts" loosely, the're no certainties in social sciences...  EDIT : for clarity
Women in fight scenes in general tend to piss me off. I'm so tired of movies pushing the idea of 90lb near anorexics being able to take down walking walls of muscle. 
my mother died from leafy green consumption 4 years ago :(. it started out with her eating simple salads after work. i tried to tell her "mom, you know those salads can be dangerous for you, please be careful!" but she didnt listen. 6 months later they found her dead with a syringe of collard greens in her arm...R.I.P. mom.
What is with the NFC South? Every year for the past 8 years, the last place team always finishes first the following year.  Granted, we are only a half season down, but there is precedence. 
You should get off your computer and be out dancing to some loud music!
&gt; ...not that I don't agree with you.  ^ That was supposed to be communicating that I agreed with you, sorry if it was vague. I did agree with you, it just struck me funny.
Sweet deal, I go to UW :)
There's no reason why trees *must* be binary branching, it's just that there are theoretical reasons why people think it actually is, related to things like constituency tests. That is to say, it seems like a lot of non-constituents (in the non-binary models) behave like constituents in many relevant ways. Binariness isn't the sort of thing that you should be introduced to right away; all the good syntax books introduce you to binariness well after you go through the non-binary phase.
Not all linguists think syntax should be binary branching.  Some might teach their undergrads that way, because it encourages soft-science/humanities types to really understand recursion or something.  That said, I think the first argument in favor of it in transformational grammar was: Kayne, R. 1984. Connectedness and binary branching.  You won't likely find any such argument in HPSG, LFG, Construction Grammar, etc., but I could be wrong.
If this comes true, i'm going to blame you. 
At least in our congress she'll have 2/3 of the votes. I guess that the congress is Obama's major problem. Maybe now we can see a tax reform in the horizon -and a political too, I hope, a reform of the way we finance campaigns.  Also Brazil is also becoming an Oil power and her career based on Energy administration was what made her president, let's see what she'll do besides that. Rousseff doesn't seem to be as creative and plural as Lula was, obviously it wont be the same as his government. 
Seriously, you should just shut the fuck up.  If you want to expose someone gaming the system for the sake of advertising, do so in an adult manner. Nobody is going to listen to a tantrum from what sounds like a 13 year old internet blowhard.   This is why we can't have nice things, and why you are collecting downvotes at a large rate.
I think that is a pretty fair assessment of things, but we're excited!
Heck Yeah that was I.  Nice.
get a job
im in pharmacy school and i totally agree with the second comment
I would suggest taking her with you, or having her there with you to pick them out(online or in person). That way you can pick something you both like, not just what you wanna see her in.
As far as I know the max lighting level is 14. 
You look like ATB.
I've been watching it on iPlayer. Have only seen the first couple of episodes so far. Great stuff.
Thanks. I just responded to this idiot. But you seem to have it under control. Carry on.
Econ 101: If enough people are willing to pay that much (which they obviously are for some reason) you can be damned sure they will keep that price. 
This is my only account. Did you ever consider there might be more than one person who might lean libertarian on reddit? Not EVERYONE here is a far left liberal.   (edit) Actually, since I can only submit once every ten minutes, I looked at those comments - I think it's pretty clear that I'm not that big of an asshole. I would at least unsuccessfully *try* to be funny. 
Oh I need a shit ton more than good luck.
I see my old apartment. :)
&gt;Yes and to go with your train of thought the fact that Turkish building codes are not followed and thousands can die in an earthquake is also justification for suicide bombing.  If you start talking about building codes in the context of a terrorist attack I would have no choice but to accuse you of trying to justify terrorism.
She sounds very immature and slightly retarded emotionally. A person who needs an object to show love doesn't understand love. Sell it and buy Fallout: New Vegas
Seriously, I hate it when people say "Tottenham Hotspurs" or "The Spurs". Makes me sick.
&gt; The count of spherical objects would be definitelly smaller, then the count of these unspherical ones.  No doubt, but this was not the claim I was disputing.
Quick question. I'm not American, so I don't really understand how lots of your laws work but... how was he not arrested for that?  Is it because there were no policemen there at the time, and video of him smoking what *appeared* to be a spliff isn't sufficient?  Can anybody help me out, I'm really confused.
Go to the supermarket and observe the meat department.
yeah, i guess you're right. i guess i have to force myself to do stuff for now, until i actually want to do whatever it is.   i've told two of my friends about the way i've been feeling, and they say that they're worried, but it doesn't seem like they are. but then again, i wouldn't know what to do if i were them.   i want to tell my parents...somehow, but i don't know how they'll react to it...especially the fact that i self harm. i think they'll be disappointed in me.
I thought about it. When I first met him I was hanging out at the neighbors house and my girlfriend asked if he could also work on me since I've been through a really bad motorcycle accident myself and have my own bowl o' problems. He get really uncomfortable and said sure through what was basically grit teeth. He later told her neighbor that he doesn't massage men and she passed it onto my girlfriend. It's worth a shot though, just to see what he does. My neck really fuckin hurts :)
Mine are named "A really obscure band, you don't know them"
I kind of wait to give someone 'credit' until they've actually done something of value to, y'know, anyone. 
The game assigns different shades of the colors depending on the biome you are in.
[Update](http://www.reddit.com/r/somethingimade/comments/dvqn6/i_made_an_online_tool_with_which_you_can_create/c141aem).
Freshman here and i'm on northside. Its not really clean vs not clean, Its just older versus newer. I would definitely avoid Walton unless you want to be hazed and treated like your in a frat but not really. other then that North side is great. Quick walk to SBISA for good food. I'm in FHK by the way.
Let's pretend you're serious:  You don't have to - on private streets.  Unless the owner makes you, as part of your toll.
Am I the only one distracted by the constant "uuum"-ing? I counted 4 "um"-s in a ten second part, and found myself counting the seconds between "um"-s instead of listening to him.
...go crazy?
The projectile vomit I let loose when shit got real in 2 Girls 1 Cup.
Worked great for me on Firefox 3.6.12 running on Ubuntu Linux 10.10.
I didn't realize there was something that came before this.
Nah, broken jaw won't keep that guy out.  Hell a broken ankle and heel couldn't keep him out.
Well, I was riding a dirtbike and I figured that if I could get to a dirt trail I could come out on another road and evade the cop that way. But he hit my bike with his car, trapping my leg between the car and a steel post sticking up out of the ground. Before that, he had pointed his gun at me, and he pointed it at me again. In court he testified that he'd couldn't read my license plate but he'd called dispatch to find out if somebody had reported a stolen motorcycle. He said that he would have shot me if there'd been a report of a stolen motorcycle... The judge gave me a choice of paying the $1000 fine or spending 40 days in county jail, so I paid the fine.
You have to look exactly at what being "rich" means.  Fundamentally, you are "rich" if you have (or can get) a lot of useful/entertaining physical things, or if you can get useful services (airplane ride, internet access, a nice haircut, etc).  If the country just prints more money, and doesn't do anything to produce more goods/services, everyone will have more money but just as many goods/services as they had before,  i.e. they won't be richer.  That's the short answer anyway.  It's possible to temporarily increase production by briefly increasing the amount of money there is (i.e. by causing inflation), because everyone will feel like they have more money and will buy more stuff, causing more production.  Except pretty quickly there won't be enough goods/services and too much money, so the prices will rise and keep rising, throwing everyone's future plans off and actually causing economic damage.  Wikipedia's articles on [Inflation](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Inflation) and [Monetary Policy](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monetary_policy) are good starting points for more info.
That's not business casual, that's just sloppy dressing!
Pokeballs.
precisely
Where do you live?
True Hero
The issue here is that Sudan is on the brink of civil war.  100,000's of people could be killed.  Including those very same child soldiers. While I am not sure that the money given by this administration will do anything to aid in that war....I am fairly certain that it will do nothing to prevent it.  Perhaps instead of military funding they could have sent in a diplomatic team aimed at preventing an all out war.  Diplomacy can, will, and has worked in the past.  I am holding out hope that the war never comes, I would love to be wrong.  But unfortunately I don't think that I am....based on the feeling of those on the ground in the Sudan.
I could see how that would hurt, but at the same time I'd be well aware of my partners needs. If it came to the point where she had to ask to masturbate, I'd realize that I am not doing my part to satisfy her (which can be done through other methods). I do agree that asking for permission is totally the wrong way to go about things.  Sorry for misinterpreting your other post, but it seemed fairly hostile.
ಠ_ಠ  ...I showed her the [fire cannon](http://www.reddit.com/r/arduino/comments/dt02h/our_latest_project_midi_controlled_fire_cannons/)
Oddly enough, I have a soft-spot for Pretty Woman, despite the fact that it stars two of my least favourite actors.   Great job from Hector Elizondo though.
Holy shit, I thought I was the only one.  Ghost Bear's Legacy was an amazing add-on pack and I don't think there's a 'mech more badass than the Kodiak.
The police came when you lost your wallet? Wow. Also, you let a monkey steal your wallet? What'd he do, threaten you with a banana? 
That's fine, I can go wit that. But what about the other aspects i mentioned?
I'll get him to show me it, but I think it's loudish. It's mostly to sit infront of my computer and practice rudiments anyway. Apparently it has a flashing light which would be good to look at while playing on a real kit, where the sound will be overpowering.
..Do you think a ghost turned them on..?
[Update](http://www.reddit.com/r/somethingimade/comments/dvqn6/i_made_an_online_tool_with_which_you_can_create/c141aem).
It gets really weird really fast.  It's a question you don't want to ask until you already know the answer, either yours or hers.  Like, if you know you want a relationship, then ask, but be ready for it to end if she doesn't.  And if you know you don't want a relationship, you don't so much ask as tell her.  
They usually only yelled when you got a new rifle or blasted the shit out of a group of zombies
I guess i over extended my finger that was reaching for the 'i' key, and dragged it across the '9' key.  Also must have missed the 'c'...  and FireFox didn't underline it so i didn't realize it was incorrect.  So 3 fails at once.
Asians man, they're geniuses.
Is adorable. 
So if I put a magnet in my vagina, I won't get pregnant?
I was about 10 yards behind you.
What, you mean people who have no accountability and no motivation for economy or frugality do a poorer job of allocating resources wisely than an individual who is directly impacted by his spending patterns and has to actively labor to raise more capital? What kind of asinine bullshit is this? Its almost like you don't realize that governments have access to the infinite data required to make efficient decisions for the multitudes! Damn free-marketers always acting like people know whats best for themselves! 
kiri kiri kiri
Agreed. Reported.
I can walk!
I wish I could take this subject a little less disgustedly so I could eloquently articulate just what exactly is so sad and pathetic about "The Game", PUAs, and this "seduction community." So far the best I can manage is a derisive _uuuugh._
My arabic is pretty rusty. I read "Where are "waffles"!". Ha, can anyone tell me the real translation?
I had a lot of fun downvoting all your comments on this thread for being really ignorant.
mindblown that people still use AIM.. I thought it was only used for bombing these days
Probably one of the best i've seen on here. Only because i fucking love that game.
You're right, I was mistaken in my definition of atheists. Sorry about that, I always just assumed people would use the term agnostic when referring to an atheist who doesn't hold a belief in God.  The thing about Russell's Teapot is that, as stated below it in the counter-argument section, a teapot is a physical thing, Religion is an idea. You asked what my beliefs are, and my belief in religion is largely based on Moral Law, something a Teapot would never be able to explain the existence of.  To further answer your question about my beliefs. I do believe in a God, I read the Bible and I believe what it says is true. I believe that when Jesus died on the cross and was resurrected, he took the sin of Man with him, thus rendering the vast majority of Old Testament law no longer required for salvation.  I was first introduced to these beliefs from my family, but I didn't hold onto them strongly until had my doubts about them and decided to explore them deeper and independently. I read a lot about both sides regarding the existence, or non-existence of God. Two of the most influential authors for the foundation of my beliefs were [C. S. Lewis](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/C._S._Lewis#The_Christian_apologist) and [Dinesh D'Souza](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dinesh_D'Souza).  I believe in [theistic evolution](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Theistic_evolution) and think [Francis Collins](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Francis_Collins_\(geneticist\)#Religious_views) hits the nail on the head. I don't believe that God is a "God of the Gaps". I believe too often, Christianity and Science are scene as incompatible which I don't think could be farther from the truth.
Like sentences are what happens to predators EZPZ. You know **NOTHIN** of Libertarians if you think there is NO police force. DEFENSE from predators is PRACTICAL. Go to LP.org **FIRST**. read the platform **BEFORE** you try to debate Libertarians.
I'm not voting because as a third party I am completely disenfranchised.
Yeah, and that red ring around my lens is a huge "steal me" sign.  When I travel abroad, I try to use bad lenses to without a hood to minimize my profile.
Better question: What doesn't Apple know?
I did what you suggested and now Windows reads that I have 3 gigs of RAM (???). Still a jump up from 2, but I think you're right about needing identical types of RAM.
Well one thing about that photo, that was clearly taken earlier in the day.  They hadn't even closed off 7th st yet with the cops on horse back.  So we are looking at before 1100 is my guess.  People continued to showing up even after the rally started and you wouldn't of been able to move still on 7th so there was many more than just what this photo shows.
What about me? I'm a transgender man.  I'm on testosterone therapy but guess what? I don't got no balls.  Are they going to keep pressing until their fingers are in my man-gina?
That child needs some fire crackers...or cherry bombs.
IMO the main problem is there is a general lack of accountability available when choosing a party. If the economy tanks while one is in charge, the other gets in. It would be better if voters could offer an opinion on the economy, the environment, education, police, defence, etc separately and then the elected party/PM is responsible for overseeing it all and keeping the books balanced.  Another problem is education doesn't teach people how to think properly. It only teaches them algebra and geometry.
espresso vodka chilled
normally thors can do air and land at once against multiple units. Meaning he can shoot ultras while he shoots mutas. However Colossus is just odd that it is classified as both air and land. If both could be used against it at once from one unit, it would be super underpowered.
After reading this, I installed, modded, and gave it a shot (have had it purchased on steam but never tried it).  Do you guys know why this game loads SO EFFING SLOWLY? I mean, like 3 minute load times. I want to give this game a shot, but that shit seems ridiculous. My system screams, so it's gotta be a software issue. Is it the 2009 mods fault?
you, sir, are a god among men
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/MechWarrior_(reboot)
pretty sure doodling a bird is illegal in every state but maybe georgia and texas?   jk. . .cute bird.
Life of the party right here.
[Update](http://www.reddit.com/r/somethingimade/comments/dvqn6/i_made_an_online_tool_with_which_you_can_create/c141aem).
http://sphotos.ak.fbcdn.net/hphotos-ak-snc4/hs1128.snc4/149018_1675158003450_1372461412_31807516_1218466_n.jpg  Weird ghost one with room mates: http://sphotos.ak.fbcdn.net/hphotos-ak-snc4/hs898.snc4/73109_500032121336_503961336_6832131_3135164_n.jpg
I wish I could tell you to go out and buy that game, and that you would enjoy it greatly.... buuuuut.... looking at those three games?  Probably not.  Main reason?  Fallout 3 is an rpg.  Nowhere close to a Japanese RPG, and a very action/shooter rpg at that, but you level up, stats are involved etc. On top of that?  Almost a million bugs.  That being said, if you can get past the bugs, and are ready to get immersed (and aren't afraid of statistics/levelling up) its got a great environment and feel to the game, and frankly is engrossing and entertaining as shit.  tl;dr yeah, probably a waste, unfortunately.
Skinny pants are not flattering on everyone, and comfort and utility needn't be sacrificed for style. If you find/make a cut of pant that is flattering to your body (kudos for being aware of what looks good on your body) and it's congruous with your personality and sense of style, then by all means, do it. There are a thousand cases of "that would be tacky/ugly/unflattering on everyone else, but for him/her, it works." Having a sense of "style" is far better than being in fashion. 
I guess he thought it was a good enough troll to pay for.
No good LIAR!
this is disappointing. 
I've had a pinched nerve in my neck due to riding in cold weather, I cannot recommend it. I can say that stretching after riding will benefit you greatly. I also go to pyhsio/massage once a month to make sure no single part of me is getting too tight. 
Seriously? Its going up from like 45 dollars a YEAR to 60 a YEAR. If you really cant afford that you have no reason to be on XBox Live in the first place. 
This doesn't sound like it has anything to do with what kind of Christian you are/aren't. It sounds to me like your mom has some serious issues and could do with some therapy. This really sucks for you, I'm sorry. :(
The same reason everybody else celebrates it: it's fun!
Don't toy with my emotions. I have dreamed of that day for a while now.
I generally avoid parties with parental chaperons.
Absolutely incorrect. Nerve length is NOT the only variable in consideration when calculating nerve velocity. You are making claims about things you have no knowledge about. The diameter as well as myelination are two very important factors that affect conduction velocity.
I could cut through 100 of those boxes with a little effort.
First, the guy asked you to name some... He didn't ask for thousands, he asked for some.  Of which you provided zero.  The original blanket statement was "American and Canadian culture are pretty similar".  Guess what, culture within Canada isn't very similar in some cases.  The point is that the original statement tries to say something but it's actually so vague to the point of being wrong. &gt; Canada and the US have were colonized at approximately the same time by the same people (predominantly the English in both cases).  From this statement alone, I can see you know little about Canadian history. &gt; They are both predominantly white and speak the same language which enables people from both countries to communicate easily and thus have friends in both countries.  You could say the same thing about Austria and Germany, but there are striking differences between the two countries.  The same could also be said about Australia and New Zealand.  All countries in South America (with the exception of Brazil) speak the same language... are they all the same culturally?  Yeah, culture is nebulous.  Which leads back to the original points about the cultures being similar.  Sure, there are similarities, but saying that they are "similar" implies that there are more similarities than there differences.  If you can't even define culture, speaking in absolute terms like these is meaningless.  As a Canadian that has worked in Canada, the US, Europe and New Zealand, I can say that there are striking differences between Canada and the US.  So much so that I would argue they are very difference culturally.  I would also argue that I see more similarities between Canada and New Zealand than I see between Canada and the US.  
pretty interesting!
Darwin would've had to be suicidal to profess any other belief, wouldn't he?  He knew the implications of what he was springing on the world.  News flash: people used to be dumbasses, and that includes the forefathers of modern science.  Newton was into astrology and alchemy.  Does that mean we should keep trying to turn rocks into gold?
In reality, they would have aged somewhat, but in the last scene they appeared to be exactly the same age as in Cobb's dreams (and the big clue is that they were wearing the same clothes as in his dreams).  EDIT: there were other subtle clues throughout the movie that indicated that reality might have been a dream level all the while.
I don't have one. I grew apart from the person who was for most of my life, and the other turned out to be a true scum bag, who if i found his corpse tomorrow, i probably wouldn't shed a tear.
Its on the about screen  Meet him, go to the about screen , verify if its yours , then beat his ass and take it
Waffles? Dont you mean carrots? HAHAHAHA
She's dressed as Jennifer Love Hewitt Pretending to be Misty?  That's mega hot.
When you have to stop because it hurts so much: it's shin splints.
The absolute scariest Halloween costume I've ever seen.
So... you're saying you're *not* MacGruber?
I assumed it was a radioactive fluid within the stealthboy that they ingested to somehow become stealthy.
Harldy WTF or a bad thing. It's only a niche dating site that has a couple of prerequisites sorted out at the front... it's not as though these people will be filtering their results based on these requirements should they be using a generic dating site. I for one would much rather know my potential future partner's intent up front than finding out later one.
Fake, I can tell by the pixels and shit.
On any wall post between two friends, it shows up as a link under the content.
yes.
I was hoping it was just a recent thing because I noticed over the last week an increase in the "derp derp" in a lot of threads... especially over the weekend. I'm hoping all the thoughtful people were just absent because they were at the rally but we also have more 4chan users, more Digg users, and just more users in general.   Please don't turn my Reddit into 4chan/youtube :( 
WOAH. SO. DAMN. GOOD.
I think he just sat around on the top of the sub as it traveled.  http://jamesgroome.com/pages/personal_site/raiders.html  This has a comic of him tying himself to the periscope as it goes to Germany.
Hit the maximize button twice -.-"
lol nice try though
.27, I had quesadillas last night.
I got lucky and scored a case early. [Mmm mmm mmm](http://www.reddit.com/r/beer/comments/dz97p/tough_choice_beerit_which_should_i_open_first/). Gonna be even better after I leave it alone for a few years in the cellar.
&gt; Or it could be that the whole climbing down the hole episode is a guilt-driven dream: the protagonist says he has been having dreams. In fact you could interpret the whole murder as a hallucination, just what the jealous, ashamed protagonist wanted to do at that moment.  re 'mulholland drive' and 'lost highway' by david lynch...i thought the same when i read this story.
When you are 60 years old, it can be nostalgic to go back and see yourself so young and having fun, even if you have had 10 boyfriends and a husband since your highschool fling.
I thought she wore red and black....white and pink is close, tho[?]
I think you meant to say that his costume is awesome.  Listening to Kornheiser on MNF forever soured me on the notion that he, himself, is awesome.
Ice cubes.  They melt and soak all the other candy.
and it doesn't mean it isn't.
My face when frog was sexiest.
Because we don't have enough fluoride in our water. It raises your intelligence, so you can see what a great leader our dear president is.
And Pedo coon quickly returned to the Pedo Creatures layer.
FFFFFFFUUUUUUUUUUUU
I think it's not much much that reality favors liberalism as there's currently a very popular kind of conservatism that gleefully and proudly denies reality on several different fronts. Liberals aren't innocent of this by any means, but conservatives have variously managed or allowed for it to be the public face of their political philosophy in recent years.  The adamant determination to reject all of the evidence (which includes scientific methodologies by professionals) pointing to yesterday's rally being larger than Mr. Beck's is just the most recent example of this.
It's a joke. Reddit is left-wing and liberal, Murdoch is a right-wing media baron who owns Fox News and several other right-wing publications.
I am absolutely on board to agree to disagree.  Interpreting "do not *always* compromise" to mean "*never* compromise" is such a glaring mistake that I cannot agree with you nor can I compromise. Your post didn't suggest that we sometimes have to compromise (even with unreasonable people) and it is good and productive to do so.  Your post was "The "middle ground fallacy" is nonsense."  Thus, you claimed, "It is nonsense that we shouldn't always compromise." Moving on now.
Sigh, as an atheist, atheists who can't get over the religious origins of holidays and celebrations should just stfu.   Assuming you're serious, which I hope you're not.
Hmm.. you referring to Kibera or Mathare? If so, I don't believe. I stayed in Karen, one of the richer suburbs in the city and safety was still an issue there. 
Oh c'mon, it has natural satellites!
If I heard correctly, my vote goes to the woman at 5:13 who yells out "I fell!"
As for insults, I was refering to the mess that followed (the mess about who sucked whos mothers' I believe), not that I felt anything was directly aimed in my direction. As for 100 times, you have posted your opinion on the matter a few that I can see, but not as concisely. I can certainly understand your viewpoint in this regard, I do have possible concerns on the extreme that could be taken.  However I do not know through just this discussion at what level that extends.  Nor is it my place to be concerned so long as no "harm" is incurred. hazzard of gaining experiance, a tendancy to want to pass it on.  I certainly would not force my opinion on someone in this nature, wouldn't be very american in a freedom mindset kind of way..  /ramble 
Weren't those g8s rebadged vauxalls(sp?)?
Unless they used gnome-mplayer at some point, they haven't made a good choice yet.
God Damn you! I was seriously about to go back to digg!
Your Fry costume beats the piss out of mine. Props on the props.
This is not because of religious phenomenon. This is a human problem. Religion and other metaphysical systems are a game of telephone in which humans lose information every time they attempt to transcribe it. The problem is people who don't understand it yet continue to profess belief in it and attempt to teach others about it.   Eventually they outnumber the knowledgeable and your religious senility kicks in. The issue isn't religion. Religion is incredibly-fucking-valuable to humanity. The problem is people who don't think and are okay with intellectual incoherency. Teaching people to replace science as their object of blind devotion does not teach people to think. Teaching the scientific method as a way to live is a start, but not the destination.  We simply need to realize that what everyone considers to be religion is fundamentally wrong and rediscover the actual meaning.  And to reemphasize and make completely explicit: Biblical literalism is fantastically irrational and should be abandoned by everyone after thinking about it. I am not opposed to science. I believe in evolution.  I am universally opposed to hatred and falsity. I support truth and love, both of which are fundamentally religious principles (i.e. rules to live by). 
I disagree. Just recently I met a girl who's cute but not superhot. She's very outgoing and confident (at least outwardly).  Negging works wonders with kind of girl.
Because it's only an allegation at this point. No one was caught in the physical act of impersonating an officer. So, there wouldn't be enough evidence to charge, let alone, convict.  The AG's office knows that doing it this way will cause more damage. If you put the individuals the came to the door, so what, an employee of the company gets locked up. Company doesn't care.  Bite 'em in the ass financially, and they're going to pay-the-fuck-attention.
it must be that thing you do where you eat the foam off the top of your cappucino before drinking it.
i'm in
In Pennsylvania, my family used to put in a quarter stick of dynamite (from 4th of July) and blow them up.  This is rural PA, mind you, but we had chunks of pumpkin on our roof after! That's good times.
It's a retarded meme, which some idiots came up with over the weekend. He's doing it wrong which is why he's downvoted.
Why do they dismiss the obvious that there might be a reason it goes the way it does?  I would think that finding this same occourance in two distinct mammals would lead one to be asking what the purpose of it may be instead of dismissing it so rapidly as inefficient design.  No theory is proffered except for mistake?  Really?  This seems to be a classic case of a brilliant man being constrained by his desire to seek proof for his idea.
Pans labryinth
I heard they opened up the mall as early as 6am. Not sure though. 
Wow.  That kid's mom seemed very stupid... "so to speak".
[Perfect Guy...](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=N6O2ncUKvlg#t=1m21s)
I can't stop reading "That monkey, sure is funky.", in my head as Nicholas Cage!
Like **ALL** xtians. **ALL** should be eliminated. Spreading fraud is a **DISEASE**. **FACT**.
Says person who hasn't had a friendship based on a solid intellectual connection that can't be easily replaced.  If you have friends who you would have no problem never seeing again, and only see out of convenience, they're not really good friends.
It can be many things, including:  * a pre-explanation for a possibly confusing post  * An inside joke not meant for others  Making assumptions about someone's intentions is pretty retarded.  If I wanted to, I could claim that your intention is to gloat how much better you are because you don't participate in [#].  But I won't, because I'm not stupid.
But if he thinks he's the real LineofBestFit, and we can't tell the difference, does it matter? 
They need to start teach Arabic to American kids. That'd get the oldies pissed.
If you read the article, you'd see he *did* choose silverlight at some time in the past.
Kids grow up so fast these days.
Give it to the bus companies lost and found, as far as i know most bus companies have one. 
that's fine, but it's kind of like saying, i have this graphing calculator but i only use the basic operations, never the graphing functions. i know there is a simple straightforward procedure involving *steps* i can learn, but i just have no need for it. so i won't ever learn it.  except that this graphing calculator is a 2-ton piece of machinery that goes 100 miles an hour.  sure, you can tell me that you learned how to be safe and avoid pedestrians, but you're just assuming that you'll never need to parallel park, or a friend would need your help parallel parking, or you'd maybe want to pass the skill on to your children so they can be safe and competent drivers as well.... assuming you'll never need it... that's negligent.
This is very similar to Edward Jenner, the creator of the first ever vaccine--for smallpox.  He essentially sold the medication for the cost of producing it, making almost no money.  He worked so hard on mass-producing the vaccine, his family life suffered greatly. Very dedicated scientist and humanitarianism
Tell the bartender to surprise you
I'm a male and I'm not a fan, but she's not nearly as bad as Andy McDowell. Imagine how much better the excellent Groundhog day would be without her.
There are some who will argue it should be as soon as puberty starts. What Di you say about that?
Bah, keep this info to yourself:  She can't kick you out without an eviction notice. It gives you 30 days of leinancy.  If the cops ask if you ever pay rent, say that the agreement was for help around the house and certain bills (internet, food).  With that, the cops can't force you out.
There was even an experiment with a white guy and black guy stealing a bike in a heavily affluent park.  I'm sure I don't have to tell you the outcome of that experiment.
It's ok happens to all of us. After 3 months of playing I just now realized I could hit F11 to fullscreen like in **everything else**!
Maybe this is where dark matter and energy come in.  Disclaimer: not a physicist. 
LOL, had to think about that, very funny, because it is true!
Bruce Willis was dead the whole time
I think the point we are missing is that this statistic doesn't mean a lot to the average man. California, at a 12.5% unemployment is one of the highest in the country. The corporate fat cats in their ivory towers can afford the taxes. It's the manufacturing plants that can't. That's why Intel moved it's fabrication plant to Arizona. Taxes are why my company moved from Seattle to Phoenix.
God damn, no luck on my iPad
You can also be a good role model, showing that "community" participation is good, cause most youngins see non-voters as simply lazy (media or not).
I'd say it still counts as a mental illness, what you are saying is like Schizophrenics aren't mentally ill because they haven't conformed to the popular view of reality, although they are aware of their condition, like pedophiles.
That's why he's called Captain Slow!
It's a private plane.  Get your own damned plane, if it's that important to you. 
Why did you vote yes on 23 ?  Visit [Ballotpedia Stats](http://www.ballotpedia.org/wiki/index.php/California_Proposition_23_\(2010\)) and look at the stats. It is supported by Oil Companies and the people/orgs against it are all Real Organisations which are not doing it for any profit.  Thanks for screwing California. 
When she started using flimsy excuses not to come out and catch up with me, since we haven't seen each other for months.  She'd say she can't afford Jamba Juice (my suggestion to meet up and drink something healthy, since she is always dieting), despite me offering to pay.  Of course, I then found out from a mutual friend (whom she also doesn't talk to much anymore) that she went on a vacation to Montreal and another gambling vacation to Atlantic City just days after I asked her to come out.  Course, things started to drift after she said it was my own fault I got raped months before this avoidance thing.  Since then, the only reasons she talks to me is to ask for favors, like to watch her car so she doesn't get a ticket.  I guess 2 decades of sleepovers and "you and me against the world" friendship is not worth the effort to her, so she's not worth the effort to me either.
What - we're getting a £5 coin!? My pockets are already heavy enoooohh wait - it's just one of those Daily Mail rip-off coins..
But don't you see, there's a *multiplier* that is supposed to make that $1.3 trillion dollars *that much better*.  Our GDP is about 14.73 trillion per year (unadjusted for inflation).  Are you really going to tell me that dropping 9% of the entire GDP (10% if we are talking real GDP) + the gains claimed to come from the multiplier effect should not have totally kicked this recession's ass?  *Really*? Fuck, there's absolutely *no arguing* with a Keynesian.  Our govt. could have spent 100% of the goddamned GDP, had it have no effect whatsoever, and you'd be here telling us that it's only because they didn't spend enough.
I'm from Canada and I love Boston and Mass
An Irish Car Bomb - Jameson + Bailey's dropped into a Guiness and chugged before the Bailey's curdles. It'll get the job done
Show me some pictures from tea party rallies with a woman dressed like this: http://i.imgur.com/JbEzT.jpg  Show me some pictures from tea party rallies with as much diversity as this: http://www.buzzfeed.com/mjs538/the-100-best-signs-at-the-rally-to-restore-sanity  Where are the pictures of the gay tea party members and the Muslim tea party members with rally signs?  Link away! 
What the heck is the lucky bastard? And where did you get these?
I don't remember Spaceman Spiff looking that evil...
When you go to the App Store and download an application, just where do you think the copy you receive comes from? The Magic Bit Fairy materializes it out of nowhere on your machine?  From a copyright law point of view (which is all that matters), Apple is making copies, and Apple is distributing copies.
That's like getting upset Rhode Islanders get to eat NE Clam Chowder instead of being forced to swallow their local monstrosity of a chowder.
I wanted to see what she looked like......
[citation needed]
It seems to me that every choice in default application and theme by Ubuntu need not be published to /r/linux , especially considering that /r/Ubuntu exists.
Me too! Yaaaay
GREAT idea!
Years ago when I went trick-or-treating with some friends we were greeted at one house by some unkempt, shirtless, &amp; overweight man.  I think we were all pretty disconcerted at first and just stared at each other in awe for a few long seconds before one of us mustered the courage to say "trick-or-treat".  At that he seemed to have an epiphany and told us to wait a few minutes until he came back.  Sure enough, a minute or two later he returned and gave us some Taco Bell hot sauce and then we went on our way.  I still don't exactly know what happened.  I mean I don't recall the lights being out on his house and I can't imagine we were the first ones to come to his house, which almost makes me wonder if the whole thing was a joke.  Though then again, we had some pretty crazy people who lived around us—including one guy who chased everyone who came on his lawn off with a real chainsaw one Halloween!  Still not sure how he got away with pulling that stunt.
Did that really just happen?
Planet of the Apes, 1984, Fehrenheit 451, Beneath a Sunless Sky.
We will never get back to the economy before the recession because the economy before the recession was an illusion, a bubble that burst. We need a new plan.
What, you have a problem with comments like "pedophiles vote for libtards and live in blue states cause libtard judges give em a pass"? (very first comment when I loaded the page)
getting an MBA is only worth the money if you are going to a t10 school.  You don't get an MBA for the education but rather for the experience.  In my opinion the masters in finance is more valuable. If you have the means to go to a t10 MBA program, do that over the masters in finance.
Everyone should please use their brain and reread the statement.   2x1y = "Three thousand deaths each decade. BFD. That's not significant." (Their claim is that it is not significant)  Now please read my comment stating how it IS significant.   Unsurprisingly, redditors have missed the mark with their comments below.  This is an unfortunate trend with reddit.com  "My neighbor who lost her husband and the father of three kids might disagree." &lt;-- shows significance   2x1y = of a feeble mind.  scenerio = high fives himself 
So it's ok if you don't start clean shaven?
The only teamliquid-like forums worth visiting is teamliquid
I hope she does it at the same time. 
I don't see any Whataburger Fancy Ketchup in there, so no I cannot spot the real treats.
Congratulations to your new job! (I assume.)
Now the only thing missing is a mouse on top of the cat.
I shouldn't have to have an answer. The status quo will always be better than an unjust alternative. I mean, shit, you can say that about anything. "You don't have an option to stop sadness? Well then, you don't have any ground to stand on when you argue that sadness should be legal"
Crohn's disease here...
I love how that arrow is pointing towards your own username.
pretty sure he zoomed and enhanced..
Battletoads
and the circle jerk continues! Yay for reddit and posting about reddit at a rally that was widely covered on reddit!
What is Locke doing all the way up there?
Moar innuendos please
Nice Build!  Seasonic is one of the best PSU makers out there - Corsair gets their PSU's from seasonic (except for some models that are made by another company - the model you have is made by seasonic I am almost positive). Good quality psu's have high amperage through their rails (3.3, 5, 12) whereas poor quality fudge the numbers of their total wattage and use lower amperage that will result in shorts if you put too much hardware in your computer.   I am not 100% sure about the memory. So I'll wait to see if anyone else can post on this.   I am not familiar with how hot the cpu will run at 3.4 on the i5 760 on a stock cooler. I found this forum post [here](http://www.tomshardware.com/forum/262347-29-temps) where a bunch of guys OC'd a i5 760 to 3.4ish. They reported temps of around 75C at load. They all had good coolers. I found this other post [here](http://www.gamespot.com/pages/forums/show_msgs.php?topic_id=27444649) and it looks like if you want to go past 3.2 you should get a aftermarket cooler.   In any case, why not wait till black friday? With some savings on the list you have - you could buy an aftermarket cooler.
How religious is she?
He's going to have the most people claiming to have met him at the rally, now...
They do. They buy wayyy more milk than walmart does. I used to go to Walmart thinking it was cheaper than everywhere but my friend told me that shoprite was way cheaper. I started going there and realized that I was getting screwed big time. Walmart really sucks for food prices. 
yep, i've seen it a few times in years past ;) NY is great.
Except for the super bowl, in which trucks are replaced with luxury cars. 
He already has a tail.
If you're not lying about who you are you're not doing it right.  Pedophiles just pretend to be a 12 year old girl.
There's only one way to do lava properly.
lol
Claim that you are gay. Women are much more trusting of gay men than straight men who they feel may have ulterior motives. Meet up with her and after you have had sex with her, tell her that you are actually straight.
Butter.   Everything looks good... but her.
I don't think you can make assumptions from the cap being torn at the end. The implication in the digging is that he has gone back to the actual spot in which he buried his brother, so the cape should be torn.   My interpretation is that the living "brother" is a skin thief or doppleganger of some sort, and that the dead brother has been unable to die because his skin was stolen. I would even go so far as to suppose the doppleganger was the original "beast".
Your ash is cuter than the other one who posted the same couple costume on /r/gaming today.
I already answered most of your post, but you just keep asking it in the face of answers from multiple people. You are one giant logic fail so I'll just leave you with this:  &gt;Addition in cranial nerves are not of particular concern in this case  No it's not, and that's why we were able to develop via evolution. If it was a problem it wouldn't exist. That is the heart of natural selection you are making right there. It's not perfect, it's not the best, it's not that bad either. It's good enough to keep going most of the time to fuck and make more offspring. You are making more cases for it being a usable byproduct of common ancestry than anything else.
What can I say? I've been there and done all that; then I found myself a role which I enjoy (hard work but lots of challenges), gives me all the freedom I could ask for (I have an awesome boss), and pays double what I was earning in corporate IT.  And I realised I -like- looking after home users. It's a good mix of simple bread and butter jobs and challenges - anything from helping someone set up their email account to recovering data after a user... well, their drive started failing and windows bluescreened on boot - so they put in the manufacturer's recovery CD, which promptly formatted the drive and began to copy files. I still managed to get roughly 80% of their data back, which included all of their photos. Managing something like that feels pretty good.
Alright, cool. Thanks for the advice!
Personally I find the maduro maduro to be better.  Great smaller cigar for a very good price though!
I call my friends faggot niggers.  Am I a racist homophobe?  Also, I have homosexual sex with black men.
I agree. The '66 had these funny little vanes between each headlight and the grille, and this vehicle does not.  This vehicle also has the chrome strip on the grille that you mention, which was gone by '68.  This is most likely a 1967 Mustang.  The presence of the racing stripes on the hood got me thinking that it might be a GT500, but the absence of hood pins and (apparent) absence of side scoops leads me to think otherwise.
One word: Chrome always installs into your frakkin win profile without ANY option of changing it. Not even with the google apps pack.  seriously, fuck this.
[Our true personality.](http://imgur.com/CCYSc.jpg)
spinrite
But thems was islamacists!
I'm at the beaach on my droid :)
I have never actually watched this show before...but he got arrested and charged for a crime that he never actually got to do? Or are they charging him for a previous crime?
I reject that sort of subjective narrative. it is what it is.
I was disappointed with the ending (or lack thereof) of I am Legend
Didn't do this for me. I've caught three fish this way tbh.
Brain hugs are different to gay hugs, but I'm open to both. :-p
The best camera is the one you have with you.
Christy Carlson Romano is hot!
Dumbass is like a beacon on you.
I'd hit that shit
That's interesting, thanks. 
wtf is the bloody guy with shaving cream and a top hat supposed to be?  I must be missing something, I haven't played since the store update.
The deal I have with my girlfriend is there are 3-6 weeks of every year where I get gaming out of my system, the rest is "her time."  This lets me really dive into my games and get through them, and then put it all away and get back to life.  It's been this way for ~12 years, and has worked out well, even with kids.   Perhaps suggest to your BF?
[Here is a cleaner version. The link you provided leaves out an image that is key to the story.](http://apfelboymchen.homeunix.net/zeux/ihnmaims.pdf)
stream down!?  wheeeeeeeeeaaaaaaaaaaaaaaat-ooooon!!!
If you ask me, it looks like the guy on the left is pissed he didn't get to be Ted.
Oh you came back! I thought you'd already be mastur-crying yourself to sleep by now.   So yeh, fallout new Vegas radio stations were disappointing huh?  P.S Try harder this time or I'll get bored again.. (OMFG two dot ellipses! NERD RAGE!!!)  I'm a black, homosexual, liberal, pot-smoking, workmans comp claiming fan of misusing the word 'cynical'. That should give you something to work with.  PPS Aren't you the rebel anti-meme saviour of the human race? I'm pretty sure I've seen 'herp derp' somewhere before.. Maybe on the internet? dot dot (no third dot in this ellipses)
Found him while digging down to bedrock. Scared the shit out of me. ;-.-  EDIT: It also appears I can't hurt him with my weapon.. I did not know that. Time to go get a bucket of lava.
it's back
Back during a controversy on Reddit, to prove my statements I called a reporter who'd interviewed Ben's mom, who had affirmed the connection. She (the reporter) confirmed it.  Added: interesting this was downmodded.  The reporter worked for the local small town newspaper where Ben's mother lived. Ben's parents are divorced. I have more details to back this up.
Holy shit, you liked North? I didn't think anyone on earth liked north. I mean I liked thankskilling, I tend to get some enjoyment out of almost any movie just for it being a movie. And even I hated north. 
Oh, gotcha. 
Can't. I am on Remicade, which is an immunosuppressant, meaning it is on the banned medication list for donating blood.  Also I have Crohn's disease which is an autoimmune disease....
Well played sir.
Oh I'm not saying to not be upset with him over the wars, in fact your anger is justified. But a vote not for him is a vote for the republicans. And if you honestly believe they will get us out of the wars then talking to you is about as useful as explaining math to tea baggers.  As for getting a challenger in the primary, you're chasing a fools errand if you think that a standing president will actually be beat considering all else he has done. Yes be angry with him, but do not be so calloused as to think he's done nothing in for this country.
Got married, knocked her up, has 2 kids now, and is really unhappy in the marriage.  I've talked to him maybe 3 times since, and really don't think I'll ever talk to him again.  She's dominated everything he does, he's unable to actually get a job in his field, and it's just sad.  Tl;dr - She's screwed his life.
Tetsuo, the Iron Man.
Did you just follow up "This is an intellectual group" with "not a circle-jerk..."
I don't think his not-brother is the same entity as his brother's corpse. The not-brother has a new coat, no wound, no blood. The corpse is as he left it - his face all red.
fml
Stop holding the pussy on a pedestal.  I was socially awkward as a young kid, but around 14-15 I gained a ton of friends. Relationships and hook ups were the norm, except for me. It killed me all the time, and all I wanted was for someone to desperately love me. I was also concerned about being the only virgin amongst my friends.   Here I am, ten years later, and I have this to say to you, don't worry about it too much. If you have the ability to make friends, you have the ability to attract a female. Trust me, I went from 17-year-old virgin to "ladies man" in about two years.   I realized one day that it wasn't that important to get laid before I got to college, I assured myself there was plenty of women out there and eventually I'd find a good one. I also made sure I constantly talked to as many women as possible, attractive or not. I became friends with girls to help me speak to women I was interested in. That was one of my biggest hurdles. Once you realize talking to a woman you are attracted to is just like speaking to anyone else, male or female, than being "smooth" is a piece of cake.  Lastly, do something drastic to your appearance like growing out your hair/shaving your head. Change something about your lifestyle, like learning an instrument or go to local concerts. Force yourself to do these things to put yourself in new situations to meet new females. This proved to myself I was a whole new person all the time. It also gives you conversation material for the female prey you are stalking, that makes them melt like butter, so it's a win-win
DO WATCH Event Horizon. It's *good.*
name 5 interesting things about Wyoming...
voting rights should be reverted for property owners only
They are playing the "smell my finger" game...
I see.  What?  You did there.
If you don't know what to do, I can tell you ;-).
BS
Weird he didn't go for the sniper rifle
i got a copy with fuck up subtitles, giving me random clips of dialogue. Definitely doesn't help with the normal insanity of the movie
Corporatism is enabled by government regulatory policy favoring the ongoing existence of a limited number of extremely large and inefficient 'businesses' which only continue to exist with the outright support of the government. That is to say, the entire banking and financial industry would fail overnight if not for ongoing intervention, as well as the military-industrial complex, big agriculture, and the other top-heavy monsters that require constant non-market income (subsidies) to operate. 
"...but i also believe that when you start to accept outright lies to advance your agenda, your agenda is shit." Lucky you fixed the plane count, or your agenda would have been shit.
One dose of Sharia Law can turn a Hippie into a frothing at the mouth Conservative. It never fails. Westerners are always all live and let live until they experience a culture that does not accept that and wants to tell us what we are going to do, how to act, what to wear, etc. Then its kill or be killed.
She's probably the type who's had quite a bit in it.
"Hey! I resemble that remark."
does a girl dress like a slut in an empty room for fun?
porn with a plotline:  californication.
I like looking at pictures of the domestic cat's nearest relative, the [African wildcat](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/African_wildcat). They look just like my dudes.
Spammer crap
You are doing FSM's work. 
:( :hug: I do the same for my girlfriend when she is sick and she does the same. Supportive SOs are the best. 
Dude seems kinda crazy.
I just froze a dead drive the other day, it didn't work.  I know people that have tried it and had it work, so take that for what you will.  
I also had the same fear of insanity about this subject. I'd heard about it ages ago and I always wondered why no-one ever seemed to mention it. It's not like I repel mosquitoes much...
Wow. So hot. Have you got a link to the original tumblr page?
No need to be so aggressive. I told you that I didn't mean to sound offensive. I was curious. Someone else cleared it up for me.
&gt;&gt; I program and work with databases and I'm an EE major.  eh ego much ? **YOU** are **NOT** the only EE major around.
See, I don't see the Tea Party as extremists.  I think the extremists *in* the Tea Party are given undo attention, and there's little interest in doing justice to the movement as a whole.  Yeah, they're conservatives, and liberals disagree with conservatives on a *lot* of thing.  But this "The Tea Party are psycho-crazies" meme has to go.
&gt;people should really just do whatever makes them happy so long as it doesn't profoundly negatively impact others.  You mean, like hold a personal set of beliefs regarding their relationship to the universe and its divine aspects? How about meeting up and being in community with like-minded individuals who share similar understandings about the relationship of human existence with the divine order?
no matter how many times i tell my g/f about mise en place, she starts cooking while i'm still chopping and measuring!
There are still a *lot* of games left, and it might take only 9 wins to take that division, so I think anyone will have a chance for a while even if they lose a couple. KC and Oak both look tenuous enough that a 3-4 game slide doesn't seem unreasonable, so I wouldn't rule out anyone yet (even Denver).  Oakland's sudden turn around is remarkable though, I never expected them to dominate anyone to that degree. Those are two of the dominating games in the entire season by any team this year.
I would say "lets agree to disagree" but that would be counterproductive.
1. Christmas has this same story.  Christmas is also now celebrated just as much by non-religious people/athiests because it's so commercialized and no longer a Christian holiday.   2. Halloween has become so commercial (like all holidays) that now it's only a reason to dress up in a silly costume.  The emphasis on evil spirits and ghosts has lessened.  No one really considers it the devil's day, except for those who would never celebrate it.   3. Kids don't really do tricks if you don't give them a treat.  Vandals will do what they want to do without an excuse.  Just close your blinds and pretend you're not home if you don't want to give candy, but nowadays it's really just little kids with their parents out there.  TL;DR: Many holidays used to be pagan and became religious.  Now all holidays are commercial and excuses for bright lights and a party.  They don't mean anything anymore, and you shouldn't take any so seriously.
102
Yeah. There are also the American Pie movies (loved them as a kid, can barely watch them now), Step Brothers, lots more..
stream is back up for me
&amp;#3232;_&amp;#3232;  Just because it doesn't work in the US doesn't mean it doesn't work elsewhere. Personally, I prefer to live in a country where I don't need a gun because everyone else has one. Turns out that things actually get safer without them. And whatever you say, it just isn't true that every criminal walking around has a 9mm.
All of human culture for the last 5000 years has been a dick-measuring contest.
C# is an amazing language. I wouldn't consider doing a GUI for Windows (and possibly Linux, haven't checked out Mono yet) with any language other than C#.  If you need something done quickly and you really don't care about efficiency or any low level details, C# is definitely the way to go. The only issue is that .NET and C# are more or less mutually inclusive in the real world, so it's no good if you need to support non-Microsoft platforms.  I'm also slightly annoyed by how verbose it can be, but that's just me being a C++ addict.
Looking good. My N1 is still stock 2.2. I want black status bar and new battery widget, though. I think I have to root tó get that, though.
What PA are you using? I know it works with T-51 and Remnant PA, but those are the two best in the game, and are BoS and Enlcave exclusives. T-45 armor and Broken PA might not work since NCR soldiers wear them.
You can never have too many FWB.
Who the fuck *wants* to use a beer bong? It's almost universally applied as a challenge and / or punishment :/
You may not be criticizing Stewart, I will.  He's full of shit on this one, in the same way as the accomodationists.  We should not be kind and play nice with the fucking loons.  Fuck the Tea Party nutters, as Stewarts rally was directly addressing, and fuck the religious nutters and we shouldn't "respect" them and play nice.  We should be "strident" and "extreme" in our opposition to all of these and shouldn't be encouraged to be civil to assholes.
Quality reddit frame on the wall there. Well played, well played?
Why are you roommates?
To be fair, you showed me the fire cannon too...
Since it's the most recent movie I've seen, I'll have to go with naming the dream architect Ariadne. It pretty much spoiled the ending of Inception for me.
what an obscure reference
[An old favourite...](http://www.wtfcostumes.com/costumes/sexy-pikachu-costume.jpg)
Just finished eating, so I couldn't make it to the end if the video.
Thanks. Yeah, I'm an exchange student studying finance at Wharton. I plan on taking the CFA tests, so I was wondering if there were some software I didn't know about that's really important. 
I saw that sign! I had a bad habit of starting up the trololololol song whenever I saw the trollface.
The boys are fishing for attention about their costume.  The girls are fishing for attention about their sexuality.
thank you. I learned something today.  I always thought that dogs laid eggs. So, yeah. I learned something today. 
drugs are bad, m'kay? so don't do drugs, cuz drugs are bad, m'kay?
ya, he just needs to put a sign on the beer   "do not drink this, I'm not kidding"   ...and then fill one of the bottles with piss.   I guarantee you won't steal his beer anymore.
That isn't a good thing for people who want to buy stocks, is it?
god original SWG was the greatest mmo i've played.  Because fantasy is what's big right now.  I bet if twilight made a gay little mmo it'd do real well.
[This just about covers it](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=I66aySW4le8)
Thanks.
Except the lipstick would end up smearing ALL OVER HER FACE.  
God I hope you knock at my door.
whered you take this? those mountains are beautiful.
I have a shitty 2k score, but I did a 60km 2 weeks ago, so that counts for something I guess.
Upgoat and maybe I'll consider it.
"A seagull ate my cell phone...  ...he ran away!" -ICP
Yah this dude sounds completely unprofessional. I realize he doesn't do it as a profession, but if he's trying to pass out business cards and all... what a perv
I saw a first-hand admission from the participants, can't find that right now, but [here's an admission from a participant that night:](http://www.dailypaul.com/node/147518#comment-1563857)  &gt;*We knew this girl was from MoveOn and she was being watched and monitored by everyone all night.*  At other points, Proffit and others talk about her being "a professional agitator" that they had seen at other rallies in their area. They are quite clear that they were *irritated* not *feeling endangered*.
[This](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt1227926/) will change your life.  Watch it as soon as you possibly can.
Is that a challenge good chap? I warn you I am a very persistent fellow, I have much to do before I die and I need at least 40 years to do it all.
Unless it's cannabis smoke [](/megusta)
I do agree with you, and I did give you an upvote. I just wanted to be another one to point out that there are negative affects of drugs, **even at normally safe and tolerable doses**.  What I laid out is not a question of "too much" or "too high a dose" or even "ridiculously stupid high dose". What I was trying to say is that there really is no telling how every person is going to react to a "normal" dose (normal here meaning dosage levels advised by sites like Erowid.org and such).  I knew a guy who, after smoking a bowl of marijuana, claimed to see the ghost of his dead grandfather talking to him in a chair next to him. He also claimed to be able to hear all of our thoughts telepathically. We all smoked the same ganja and we had no issues at all, just him. Granted, this guy probably had some form of mental illness, but bad things can and still occasionally happen to people who **try to use responsibly**.  I guess I was just doing the devil's advocate thing.  It's always tricky to try to bring those subjects up in discussions like this **while still agreeing that banning drugs is not the answer**.  I hope I've cleared that up at least for you. I'd like to see most everything regulated. I'd like to see everyone provided with accurate information about substances and how they can **try** to safely use them.
It should be noted that there is no way to prove the god case one way or the other. Science is making conclusions based on factual observation - implementing such an educational video, laden with conclusions such as disproving the possibility of an intelligent creator based on merely a dissection - would go against the basis of the initial mission: to produce minds that judge based on undeniable fact-not probability and belief.
That's exactly why I posted it! Thanks for the upvote. 
He licked it clean... 
&gt; Socialism=Stalinism in the eyes of many it seems.   FTFY.  The communism everybody is scared of is actually socialism.  The USSR was a socialist state.  Communism in itself is stateless.  This tends to confuse a lot of people, many who even consider themselves educated. &gt; just brushed over Marx at the end.   Marx was not an standalone economist, so accordingly you likely would not learn much about him in an economics class. He is a political economist http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Political_economist , which you would learn about in a class in politics or civics/government.  The others you listed also should not have been taught, that is just a bad education all around. But I was taught about Marx in HS, we spent more time on him than on Smith.   I don't think this needs to be taught in schools, people just need to take an active role.  Plus if we are going to teach it, solely left and right ideologies should not the only ones included.  Libertarianism/Anarchism and Authoritarianism should also be taught.  
Finally, a Pyro.  There's a Spy around here, and we need someone to find him. 
Dark-age.com is a fun post-apoc sf skirmish game as well. Not a lot of room needed either.
now get out there and climb some fucking buildings
